Nerve net transmission in Metridium at 21 degrees C. varies from 121 to 146 mm. per second.
1. It is shown by volumetric analysis that on the alkaline side from its isoelectric point gelatin combines with cations only, but not with anions; that on the more acid side from its isoelectric point it combines only with anions but not with cations; and that at the isoelectric point, pH = 4.7, it combines with neither anion nor cation. This confirms our statement made in a previous paper that gelatin can exist only as an anion on the alkaline side from its isoelectric point and only as a cation on the more acid side of its isoelectric point, and practically as neither anion nor cation at the isoelectric point. 2. Since at the isoelectric point gelatin (and probably amphoteric colloids generally) must give off any ion with which it was combined, the simplest method of obtaining amphoteric colloids approximately free from ionogenic impurities would seem to consist in bringing them to the hydrogen ion concentration characteristic of their isoelectric point (i.e., at which they migrate neither to the cathode nor anode of an electric field). 3. It is shown by volumetric analysis that when gelatin is in combination with a monovalent ion (Ag, Br, CNS), the curve representing the amount of ion-gelatin formed is approximately parallel to the curve for swelling, osmotic pressure, and viscosity. This fact proves that the influence of ions upon these properties is determined by the chemical or stoichiometrical and not by the "colloidal" condition of gelatin. 4. The sharp drop of these curves at the isoelectric point finds its explanation in an equal drop of the water solubility of pure gelatin, which is proved by the formation of a precipitate. It is not yet possible to state whether this drop of the solubility is merely due to lack of ionization of the gelatin or also to the formation of an insoluble tautomeric or polymeric compound of gelatin at the isoelectric point. 5. On account of this sudden drop slight changes in the hydrogen ion concentration have a considerably greater chemical and physical effect in the region of the isoelectric point than at some distance from this point. This fact may be of biological significance since a number of amphoteric colloids in the body seem to have their isoelectric point inside the range of the normal variation of the hydrogen ion concentration of blood, lymph, or cell sap. 6. Our experiments show that while a slight change in the hydrogen ion concentration increases the water solubility of gelatin near the isoelectric point, no increase in the solubility can be produced by treating gelatin at the isoelectric point with any other kind of monovalent or polyvalent ion; a fact apparently not in harmony with the adsorption theory of colloids, but in harmony with a chemical conception of proteins.
A wave is described occurring in the venous pulse of man late in the diastolic period. This wave is a diastolic wave, since in an increase in length of the cardiac cycle it follows the h wave at its regular interval and becomes separated from the a wave of the next cardiac cycle. There is no wave on the venous pulse in man which can be referred to a contraction of the region of the great veins or sinus region of the heart. The h wave is a normal occurrence in the venous pulse curve from man and the dog. It occurs, according to the experience in this work, in all normal individuals in which the heart rate is sufficiently slow to prevent its obliteration by the a wave. The x wave, while not infrequent, is not always present in man even when the cardiac cycle is of sufficient length to prevent its obliteration by the a wave. This wave has not been observed in the dog. There is no wave on the venous pulse curve of the dog that can be referred to a contraction of the sinus region of the heart. Extra-systoles from stimulation of the venous region of the dog's heart produce no contraction of this region sufficiently pronounced to be recorded on a venous pulse tracing. After an interval of from 0.07 to 0.I second, representing the interval of veno-auricular conduction plus the latent period of the auricle, the auricle contracts. Extrasystoles from stimulation of the right auricle show, after an interval following the stimulus much shorter than that noted above and representing the latent period of the auricle, an a wave followed by ventricular systole after the usual a-c interval. It would seem probable that the sinus region of the heart, while capable of irritability, conductivity and rhythmicity (Erlanger and Blackman (I6)), does not normally manifest contractility.
1. Rabbits living in an atmosphere of carbon monoxide react in general as guinea-pigs react. 2. The increased specific gravity of the blood in " carbon monoxide " rabbits is due wholly to the increase in the number of erythrocytes and of hemoglobin, and not to any change in the plasma. 3. Weigert's law of inertia, that production would continue after the stimulus has ceased to act, does not hold in the case of carbon monoxide stimulated rabbits. 4. Hemolysins, precipitins and agglutinins towards normal rabbit corpuscles and sera were not present in carbon monoxide rabbits. 5. " Hemopoeitin " or anything of a similar nature was not found in rabbits in any stage of erythrocyte degeneration or regeneration.
1. Adrenalin injected intraperitoneally increases the rapidity of absorption of fluid from the peritoneal cavity, independently of whether the solution to be absorbed is hypotonic or hypertonic or is approximately isotonic with the blood serum. The intravenous injection of adrenalin also increases the absorption of fluid, but not so markedly as does the intraperitoneal injection. 2. Adrenalin injected either intraperitoneally or intravenously increases the quantity of sodium chloride absorbed. The relative absorption of sodium chloride-the movement from the peritoneal cavity of sodium chloride, as compared with the movement of water-is slightly increased when 0.85 per cent. of sodium chloride solution and adrenalin are injected intraperitoneally; but it is diminished when adrenalin is injected intravenously, or when 1.5 per cent. sodium chloride solution and adrenalin are injected. When distilled water has been injected intraperitoneally, adrenalin decreases the relative amount of sodium chloride in the peritoneal fluid-a fact that is evidently related to the increased elimination of sodium chloride through the kidneys under the influence of adrenalin. 3. When 0.85 per cent. sodium chloride solution is injected into the peritoneal cavity, the blood becomes diluted after two hours and a half. When adrenalin is also injected, the dilution of the blood is less marked, in spite of the increased absorption under the influence of adrenalin. When distilled water is injected into the peritoneal cavity, the blood is diluted equally in control and adrenalin experiments. When 1.5 per cent. sodium chloride solution is injected, the dilution of the blood is very slight, and in adrenalin experiments it is the same as in control experiments or very slightly greater than in control experiments. 4. The increase of absorption from the peritoneal cavity caused by the injection of adrenalin is not due to the increased diuresis caused by the injection of this substance. 5. The injection of adrenalin causes a temporary increase in the osmotic pressure of the blood, which gradually returns to normal. Under certain conditions, after the injection of adrenalin, there is a tendency toward maintaining the higher osmotic pressure of the blood serum, even up to the end of the experiment. We have reason to believe that this increase in the osmotic pressure of the blood is the main factor in increasing the absorption of fluid from the peritoneal cavity. 6. In experiments in which 0.85 per cent. sodium chloride solution has been injected intraperitoneally, either with or without adrenalin, there exists a tendency of the peritoneal fluid to attain a greater osmotic pressure than the blood serum, in spite of the fact that the injected fluid is slightly hypotonic as compared with the blood serum. We note a similar condition in cases of general edema in man, in which the osmotic pressure of the ascitic fluid is greater than that of the other edematous fluids, or even that of the blood serum. There exists, therefore, a mechanism that causes the passage of osmotically active substances from the blood or from the tissues into the peritoneal cavity, and that causes the osmotic pressure of the peritoneal fluid to become higher than that of the blood. It follows from our experiments that this mechanism, which causes the ascites in edematous persons to have such a high osmotic pressure, is not dependent upon certain pathological changes in the lining membranes or upon other pathological conditions, but exists already in normal animals. 7. The addition of 1.22 per cent. calcium chloride solution to 0.83 per cent. sodium chloride solution, in such proportions as we used in our infusion experiments, in which we determined the transudation into the peritoneal cavity, delays the absorption of fluid from the peritoneal cavity but very slightly. Therefore, calcium chloride increases directly the transudation into the peritoneal cavity and does not cause an increase in the amount of fluid in the peritoneal cavity merely by inhibiting the absorption. 8. It follows that adrenalin does not increase the amount of peritoneal transudate found after the intravenous infusion of large quantities of sodium chloride solution, to which adrenalin has been added, by delaying the absorption from the peritoneal cavity. The increased amounts of peritoneal fluid must be due to increased transudation into the peritoneal cavity; and the adrenalin, in view of its marked effect on absorption from the peritoneal cavity, must increase the movement of fluid into the peritoneal cavity much more strongly than could be assumed from the figures obtained in the infusion experiments.
Is this thyroid hyperplasia true carcinoma? In view of the facts that young fish are more affected than old fish, that iodin stops the hyperplasia and causes it to return to the colloid state, that removal of the fish from the ponds to the open brook also affects a cure, that the clinical incidence of tumors is directly related to the water supply, and that the severity of the disease as determined by histological examination is likewise directly related to the water supply, we cannot accept the prevailing opinion that the disease is true cancer. On the other hand, we believe that the disease as studied by us is an extreme illustration of endemic goitre, the end stage of which is cretinism. The opinion that it is cancer is based purely on anatomical studies-the essential fact being that the growing thyroid invades bone, muscle, etc. Such findings in mammalian tissues are strong evidence of malignancy, but this standard cannot be applied to fish thyroids for the reason that any growth of a widely and loosely distributed nonencapsulated gland would give the histological appearance of invasion of the surrounding tissues. The general views as to the cause of the disease may be divided into two groups: (I) infectious and (2) metabolic. Taking up the infectious theory, there are abundant grounds for such a view when one considers the flora of the tank. The very careful histological examinations by Hofer, Bonnet and Pick have yielded uniformly negative results. Direct infection cannot be excluded, but the fact that fish placed in the tail-race recover spontaneously, although living in the theoretically most polluted water, is not in harmony with our present conception of water-borne infection. Taking up the metabolic theory, the three factors of overfeeding, overcrowding and limited proportional water supply together with the many possibilities into which they are divisible seem to us to be in some way, still obscure, directly concerned with the development of the disease. It is not probable that a single substance, whether the result of food decomposition or of excretory products, excites the thyroid to its activity but rather that the thyroid reaction is the result of the activity of a great variety of these products.
The present paper deals with a comparison of the conditions which determine the fate of transplanted tumor and of a transplanted normal tissue capable of growth. Mouse embryo and mouse-tumor were employed as material. It was shown that individuals differ as hosts for transplanted embryo, some being naturally resistant to its growth, and some favorable, just as is known to be the case where tumor is concerned. The fate of implanted tumor depends directly on whether it elicits from the host a vascularizing stroma. So, too, it is with implanted embryo. Furthermore mouse-embryo, like mouse-tumor, when introduced into rats calls forth a stroma and grows for a brief period. In attempt to answer the question as to whether individuals favorable (or resistant) to implanted tumor are likewise favorable (or resistant) to implanted embryo, it was shown that the factors of age, nutritive condition, and race, which are potent in determining an animal's status as a tumor-host, act similarly in determining that for embryo. Using embryonic tissue and a method which has proven effective for the production of immunity to implanted tumor, an immunity to implanted embryo was brought about. This immunity manifests itself in the same way as that for implanted tumor, namely, by an absence of the stroma-reaction necessary to life of the engrafted tissue. These results demonstrate how largely tumor obeys in its adaptation to a new host and growth therein, the general laws regulating a transplanted normal tissue. Besides the phenomena here dealt with many others that have held the attention of workers with transplantable tumors are probably not peculiar to neoplasm. The present findings emphasize the importance of the tumor-problem as a tissue-problem; and they further indicate how essential it is in cancer work to discriminate between characters unique with tumor and those which it possesses in common with normal tissue.
The daily drinking of three liters of water with meals, for a period of five days, by a man twenty-two years of age who was in a condition of nitrogen equilibrium through the ingestion of a uniform diet, was productive of the following findings : 1. An increase in body weight, aggregating two pounds in five days. 2. An increased excretion of urinary nitrogen, the excess nitrogen being mainly in the form of urea, ammonia, and creatine. 3. A decreased excretion of creatinine and the coincident appearance of creatine in the urine. The decreased creatinine output is believed to indicate that the copious water drinking has stimulated protein catabolism. The appearance of creatine is considered evidence that the water has caused a partial muscular disintegration resulting in the release of creatine, but not profound enough to yield the total nitrogen content of the muscle. The output of creatine is, therefore, out of all proportion to the increase in the excretion of total nitrogen. 4. An increased output of ammonia which is interpreted as indicating an increased output of gastric juice. 5. A decreased excretion of feces and of fecal nitrogen, the decrease in the excretion of fecal nitrogen being of sufficient magnitude to secure a lowered excretion of both the bacterial and the non-bacterial nitrogen. 6. A decrease in the quantity of bacteria excreted daily. 7. An increase in the percentage of total nitrogen appearing as bacterial nitrogen. 8. A lower creatinine coefficient. 9. A more economical utilization of the protein constituents of the diet. 10. The general conclusion to be reached as the result of this experiment is to the effect that the drinking of a large amount of water with meals was attended by many desirable and by no undesirable features.
Gravimetric determinations were recorded for the total and several individual proteins (in the sodium oxalate plasma) fractioned with ammonium sulphate and sodium chloride. At precipitation, the plasma salt mixture had been diluted to a final volume of ten times the amount of plasma employed. Coagulations were on aliquot portions of filtrates, and the individual protein constituents (except serumalbumin) were calculated by difference. The eleven horses had been subjected to simultaneous immunization against diphtheria and tetanus toxins, each horse being subsequently continued on the toxin to which it responded best. Test bleedings of about 500 cubic centimeters only were made until maximum antitoxic potency (with almost coincident greatest variation See PDF for Structure in the contents of the several proteins) had been attained; routine bleedings of four to ten liters for antitoxin production were then instituted. The two refractory, one medium and the eight horses yielding a highly potent antitoxic plasma, all showed an increase of from 40 to 114 per cent. in the total serumglobulin. For the refractory animals, this increase was 59.3 and 87.9 per cents. In one refractory and in one high horse, the serumglobulin maximum preceded the highest concentration in antitoxin. In seven of the horses, the greatest increase in the total serumglobulin was coincident with the maximum antitoxic potency. The serumglobulin increase, however, tended relatively to precede that of the antitoxin. In the two other horses, both maxima also were observed together; no "intermediate" bleedings were made in these two instances. The greatest absolute increase in the serumglobulin was observed in the most potent plasma obtained in the series; the second place, however, went to a refractory horse. Subsequent to the maxima, the serumglobulin content was maintained at high concentration, in spite of repeated bleedings; it then only roughly paralleled the antitoxic variations in the plasma of the individual animals. At dilutions of the plasma in the precipitated mixtures of 1:15, 1:5 and 1:10, the ammonium sulphate "euglobulin" fraction amounted to about 60 to 70, 20 to 24 and 10 to 15 per cents., respectively, of the total serumglobulin in both the normal and the antitoxic plasma. In an 850 unit plasma, an increase in the "euglobulin" over the normal percentage was observed, but the high content of protein in this plasma probably influenced the precipitation limits. The influence of the protein concentration is indicated by the different percentages for the "euglobulin" obtained for the three dilutions of 1:15, 1:5 and 1:10. The "euglobulin" then was not increased to a greater extent than the "pseudoglobulin" as the result of immunization, as has at times been maintained. See PDF for Structure The "euglobulin" precipitated by saturating the plasma with sodium chloride (at ultimate dilution of the plasma 1:10) was much greater in normal plasma than the ammonium sulphate "euglobulin" at the same dilution. There was a tendency in early immunization for this sodium chloride "euglobulin" to increase along with the total serumglobulin; it rapidly diminished, however, until at the height of immunization and maximum serumglobulin concentration, it may have reached less than half the normal absolute amount. The serum albumin was diminished a third to a half the normal along with the serumglobulin increase. Subsequent to the anti- See PDF for Structure toxic and serumglobulin maxima, figures as low as a fifth of the original serumalbumin content have been noted. It is suggested that this diminution of the sodium chloride "euglobulin" and the serumalbumin is a physiological compensation for the greater viscosity of the plasma because of the increase in the more soluble serumglobulins. No characteristic alteration in the fibrinogen of the plasma was observed during immunization. Individual variations up to 0.5 gram per 100 cubic centimeters of plasma have been recorded. The influence of repeated bleedings does not essentially influence the protein changes induced by immunization. These remarkable regenerative processes are worthy of note. The results of our investigation indicate that in "forced" immunization, the same characteristic quantitative changes can occur in the blood proteins of both refractory horses and those yielding a highly potent antitoxic plasma. We cannot conclude, however, that the serumglobulin increase does not represent an accumulation of antitoxin, at least in part; it is possible that other antibodies may be formed either prior to or along with the specific antitoxin and that these may constitute a portion of the increase in the more soluble serumglobulin with which protein such substances are associated.
There exists a far-reaching analogy between the cutaneous trichophytin reaction and the cutaneous tuberculin reaction. Both indicate that the organism is the seat of a definite infection or that it has passed through such an infection. Both may persist for a long time after the active disease has come to rest, indicating that the infection has left the organism in a state of altered reactivity-allergy. Under certain conditions both may be of diagnostic value, but since the reaction persists for a long time after the infection has passed, the negative reaction may be of greater value, excluding the existence of a specific infection. The analogy of the trichophytin reaction with the tuberculin reaction is not only limited to the obvious clinical manifestations, but, as in the tuberculin reaction, it can be shown that with uniform concentration of antibody, the intensity of the reaction is dependent on the concentration of the trichophytin. A tentative explanation of the halo formation is offered, based on a rapidly renewed formation of antibody stimulated probably by the entrance of a small amount of allergen into the general circulation.
When a segment of artery, killed by heat, formalin or glycerin is transplanted, it undergoes a rapid degeneration. Its muscle fibers disappear while the tissue of the host reacts by building a new wall of connective tissue. When the transplanted vessel has been preserved in a condition of latent life, no degeneration of the wall occurs, or the wall undergoes only partial degeneration. The muscle fibers can keep their normal appearance, even for a long time after the operation. It is, therefore, demonstrated that arteries can be preserved outside of the body in a condition of unmanifested actual life. The best method of preservation consists of placing the vessels, immersed in vaselin, in an ice box, the temperature of which is slightly above the freezing point. From a surgical standpoint, the transplantation of preserved vessels can be used with some safety. When the arteries were kept in defibrinated blood or vaselin and in cold storage, the proportion of positive results was 75 and 80 per cent., and this can probably be increased.
1. In the experiments recorded in this paper the influence of the osmotic pressure of the blood upon absorption of fluid from the peritoneal cavity becomes apparent. Nephrectomy, removal of the adrenals, and other operations increase the osmotic pressure of the blood and increase the absorption of fluid from the peritoneal cavity. On the other hand, ether narcosis, at the period at which we tested its influence, causes neither an increase of osmotic pressure of the blood nor an increase in the absorption of fluid from the peritoneal cavity. 2. The increased osmotic pressure and increased absorption of fluid in nephrectomized animals is to a great extent not a specific effect of the removal of the kidneys, but approximately the same conditions can be observed after incisions of the skin and muscles. 3. After poisoning with uranium nitrate and in cases of peritonitis, complicating factors come into play, and under such conditions the absorption from the peritoneal cavity is not increased, notwithstanding the higher osmotic pressure of the blood. 4. In conditions in which the osmotic pressure of the blood is very high before the injection of sodium chloride solution into the peritoneal cavity (nephrectomized rabbits or rabbits injected with uranium nitrate three days previously), adrenalin causes no increase, or only a very slight one, in the absorption of peritoneal fluid. On the other hand, one day after the injection of uranium nitrate the osmotic pressure of the blood is only slightly increased before the injection of the sodium chloride solution into the peritoneal cavity, and here adrenalin causes a marked increase in absorption of fluid from the peritoneal cavity. 5. In animals injected with uranium nitrate the retention of sodium chloride and other osmotically active substances in the blood is not entirely due to interference with the functions of the kidney. This retention may be explained either by an inability of the tissues to bind the sodium chloride and other osmotically active substances or to a diminished permeability of the blood vessels for such substances. 6. While in nephrectornized animals the elimination of sodium chloride from the peritoneal cavity and also from the blood is increased, in animals injected with uranium nitrate such an elimination is diminished. This increase in the sodium chloride content of the peritoneal fluid in animals treated with uranium nitrate is accompanied by a decrease in the diffusion of other osmotically active substances into the peritoneal cavity. 7. While in nephrectomized animals and in animals injected with uranium nitrate one day previously, adrenalin causes a diminution of the fluid retained in the blood-vessels similar to the diminution noted in normal animals, adrenalin no longer exerts such an effect at a later stage of the uranium nitrate poisoning. At this period after the administration of uranium nitrate, the retention of fluid in the blood vessels is apparently equal in experiments with and without the injection of adrenalin, and following the absorption of fluid from the peritoneal cavity, the retention of fluid in the blood vessels in the uranium nitrate animals is increased comparatively to a greater extent than in normal animals. 8. Our experiments show a marked difference in the distribution of fluid and of osmotically active substances in nephrectomized animals and in animals injected with uranium nitrate. This difference may explain the much greater liability to the development of edema in animals injected with uranium nitrate.
I. In normal animals the injection of caffeine slightly diminishes the absorption of fluid from the peritoneal cavity, in spite of the fact that the amount of fluid and sodium chloride eliminated through the kidneys is markedly increased. The lessened absorption of fluid is due to a slight lowering of the osmotic pressure of the blood. II. In nephrectomized animals caffeine increases the absorption of fluid from the peritoneal cavity; the increase in absorption is greater in nephrectomized animals which received caffeine than in nephrectomized animals which did not receive this substance, and it is due to additive increase in the osmotic pressure of the blood. In a similar manner, caffeine increases the absorption of fluid from the peritoneal cavity in animals in which, instead of nephrectomy, other operations, not directly affecting the kidneys, had been performed. In this case also the increase in absorption is presumably preceded by and due to an increase in the osmotic pressure of the blood. III. In animals injected with uranium nitrate three days previously, caffeine diminishes the absorption of fluid from the peritoneal cavity, notwithstanding the high osmotic pressure of the blood which we observe in such animals. This agrees with the results of our previous experiments in which we found that in animals injected with uranium nitrate the absorption of fluid is not increased in spite of the rise of the osmotic pressure of the blood. IV. At the time of the conclusion of the absorption experiments, the amount of fluid retained in the vessels was found to be diminished in each series in which caffeine was used. Only in certain cases can this be due to the increased amount of fluid leaving the blood vessels through the kidneys; in other cases it can only be due to a movement of water from the blood vessels into the tissues caused by the injection of caffeine. V. In normal animals, in nephrectomized animals and in animals in which an operation not directly affecting the kidneys had been performed, caffeine causes an absolute and relative increase in the elimination of sodium chloride from the peritoneal fluid, as a result of which the remaining peritoneal fluid shows a lessened content of sodium chloride. Caffeine causes also a decrease in the sodium chloride content of the blood. We see, therefore, that under the influence of caffeine a greater amount of sodium chloride is eliminated from the body fluids into the tissues or through the kidneys. The factors which cause the sodium chloride to leave the body fluids are probably primarily responsible for the diuresis which takes place after administration of caffeine. In the case of caffeine and other similar substances the diuresis is, therefore, in all probability not due primarily to a specific action of the kidney, but to conditions which affect the distribution of sodium chloride in the body. VI. The distribution coefficient of other osmotically active substances differs from that of sodium chloride. These other substances have a tendency to move into the body fluids in increased quantities under the influence of caffeine. VII. Summarizing all experiments in which we studied the absorption from the peritoneal cavity, we may state that changes in the osmotic pressure of the blood represent the principal factor in explaining the variations in the rate of absorption of fluid from the peritoneal cavity. VIII. There exists no direct relation between an increase in the rate of absorption of fluid from the peritoneal cavity and an increase in the amount of urine secreted. If it should be found that even at a period following the injection of caffeine, later than that at which we have studied the absorption, a rise of the osmotic pressure of the blood does not appear, then we may state that the diminution in the amount of edema in the body cavities resulting from the administration of caffeine is entirely due to an inhibition of the production of edema and not to an increased absorption of fluid from the serous body cavities.
IN SUMMARIZING THE RESULTS OF THIS WORK I FEEL JUSTIFIED IN DRAWING THE FOLLOWING CONCLUSIONS: 1. The fuchsin body represents a type of body subject to wide variations in morphology and in staining reaction. 2. Though more frequently associated with plasma cells than with any other cell type, these bodies may and do occur in a great variety of cells. 3. Further, certain sections show unmistakable fuchsin bodies within blood vessels; some of these bodies are true hyaline thrombi, while others are due to autolytic changes in the red blood corpuscles. 4. Fuchsin bodies are most numerous in granulation tissue and lymphoid areas. In the former, they follow closely the distribution of capillaries and show a parallel with the changes in the extra- and intravascular red blood corpuscles. 5. The number and type of fuchsin bodies in tissues can be influenced by methods of fixation, the number of typical bodies being inversely proportional to the rapidity and degree of fixation of the red blood cells. 6. The type of body found after the best fixation is not, as a rule, what is considered the typical form, but an irregular fragmentary type or the fuchsinophilic granular form. 7. The identity in staining reaction, the constant association with changes in red blood corpuscles, the relation to distribution of capillaries in granulation tissues, the occurrence in hemorrhagic lesions associated with pigment, the intravascular occurrence, and, finally, the close relation to pigment deposits, all indicate conclusively that fuchsin bodies arise from red blood corpuscles. 8. No theory of origin from plasma cells, or other granular cells, offers an adequate explanation for the origin of fuchsin bodies, nor can any theory prove adequate which does not take into account the red blood corpuscles. 9. The peculiar association of plasma cells with fuchsin bodies and hemosiderin seems explainable on the assumption that the plasma cell in such instances is the active factor in a metabolic process, the fuchsin body representing a stage in the metabolism of hemoglobin by an intracellular enzyme, and hemosiderin, one of the products of the process.
1. By following the method of Osborne, Mendel and Harris, we can obtain an extremely potent toxin from the castor bean. 2. It would appear, as a result of testing this preparation at the end of two and a half years, that the agglutinating function and the toxic function are two distinct properties. 3. This result is also borne out by the behavior under the electric current; either we are dealing with two different substances or else with a single substance with two distinct toxiphore groups, one of which is stable and the other labile.
1. Anaphylaxis or allergy of rabbits against horse serum can be proved by subcutaneous test. 2. The test is best made in the following way. The skin of the animal, preferably of the abdomen or flank, is shaved. (This should be done a few hours before the injection.) The injection is made by means of a small hypodermic syringe and intradermally. An effort was made not to inject the serum under the skin. Those injections were considered most favorable by which the serum remained as a small bleb in the skin proper. Undiluted horse serum was used for most of the experiments. The amount injected varied from 0.0I cubic centimeter to I cubic centimeter. The reaction seemed as definite after 0.0I cubic centimeter as after a larger quantity. See PDF for Structure 3. The specific reaction appears in from twelve to twenty-four hours after the test is made and reaches its maximum in from twenty-four to thirty-six hours. It consists of a local swelling extending from 0.5 to 2 centimeters from the point of inoculation. The skin involved in the raised area is usually red and hotter than the surrounding skin. Macroscopically and microscopically the reacting area has the appearance of a local acute inflammation. 4. The altered reactivity (allergy) or hyper-susceptibility (anaphylaxis) sets in usually in from ten to fifteen days after the first injection of horse serum, and lasts at least three months. Individual rabbits show marked variation from the average time of the development of anaphylaxis. 5. The appearance of precipitines against horse serum in the blood of rabbits appears nearly synchronously with the allergic condition. 6. After large injections of serum the allergic rabbits still react subcutaneously. A suppression of allergy which would correspond to the so-called anti-anaphylaxis could not be proved. 7. Also in regard to the offspring of injected rabbits the subcutaneous test was not positive. The young of these rabbits did not develop a more active allergy than the young of normal rabbits. 8. Neither the injection of considerable quantities of horse serum nor the development of a marked local reaction in the skin after intradermal inoculations of horse serum in a sensitized rabbit is accompanied or followed by greater variations in the number or types of leucocytes in the circulating blood than is found in control animals.
The results obtained show that adrenalin, transfusion with salt solution, and the inhalation of tobacco smoke caused an increased circulation in the coronary vessels. Amyl nitrite and nitroglycerin produce the opposite effect. Digitalis, strophanthus, caffeine, and theobromine give no change in the velocity of circulation. We can conclude from the results that the blood pressure is the main element which influences coronary circulation, while the other factors play only a minor part in its variations.
These experiments show that it is possible to cause, by the proper use of hydrazine and phosphorus, a very high degree of fatty change in the liver with a minimum of necrosis, involving alike both peripheral and central portions of the lobule and thus eliminating the " factor of safety" or residual normal cells. Nevertheless, it is found that such fatty liver tissue has not lost in the least its power to oxidize uric acid when acting upon it in vitro with abundant air supply, nor is the power to oxidize xanthine to uric acid noticeably diminished. Since these two enzymes, and especially the uricolytic enzyme, are about the last to appear in the development of the animal kingdom and also of the individual mammal, it is to be expected that they will be among the first of the enzymes to be destroyed by injurious agencies, but evidently they are not affected by conditions that lead to the highest degree of fatty metamorphosis of the cytoplasm of the hepatic cells. While these experiments merely prove that extreme fatty degeneration does not destroy or appreciably diminish the power of liver cells to oxidize uric acid and xanthine in vitro, yet they suggest that in general fatty degeneration is probably not essentially incompatible with a high degree of metabolic activity by the affected cells. It is possible that in the living tissue functional activity may be decreased secondarily by fatty metamorphosis, as, for example, by the enlarged fatty cells compressing the capillaries and reducing circulatory activity, or by modification of diffusion through the cell by the fat deposits, independent of any deleterious influence upon the cellular enzymes themselves. Other experiments will be required to determine whether steatogenic poisons leave intrahepatic enzymes other than the uricase equally unaffected, but as it has already been shown by Jacoby that the autolytic enzymes and aldehydase in the liver cells are not destroyed by phosphorus poisoning, and Abderhalden and Schittenhelm* found that peptids are hydrolyzed fully as rapidly by phosphorus livers as by normal livers, it seems probable that extreme fatty metamorphosis is not associated with any serious injury to the enzymes by which the liver cells perform their metabolic functions, with the possible exception of those enzymes concerned with the metabolism of fats.
1. Rabbits can be infected in the testicle with the spirochetae of yaws as well as with those of syphilis and the infection can be continued through successive generations in pure culture. 2. The infection shows itself by enlargement of the testicle and the presence of a nodule varying in size from that of a pea to that of an olive. The infection consists in a necrosis of the tubules, an infiltration of round cells and the new formation of an edematous connective tissue. 3. The complement fixation reaction occurs in rabbits infected with the spirochetae of yaws as well as in those infected with the spirochetae of syphilis. 4. This lesion makes possible the investigation of the problems of cultivation, of immunity and of treatment.
1. Hemosiderin may be produced outside of the animal body and is increased in the liver of rabbits, during autolysis, for a period of from twenty-four to forty-eight hours. 2. Post-mortem hemosiderin formation is most marked in parts of livers exposed to air, and hemosiderin is, apparently, an oxidation product of hemoglobin due to enzyme action. 3. Hemosiderin is derived from hemoglobin directly and not from hematin as an intermediate product. 4. The later stages of autolytic changes show that the acid products of proteid autolysis, especially the phosphorus acids, are capable of producing a cleavage of hemosiderin and uniting with the iron to form a new series of products which react microchemically for both phosphorus and iron. In such cleavage, pigments analogous to the bile pigments are formed. 5. The relationship observed between hemosiderin and hematoidin is such as would indicate that hematoidin is the pigment matter of hemosiderin. 6. Further, it seems probable that the vital cycle of hemoglobin metabolism in the liver is largely intranuclear; the hemoglobin is converted into hemosiderin either within the nucleus or cell protoplasm; the iron of the hemosiderin is bound by an acid radicle of the nucleo-proteid, and the hematoidin is excreted as bile pigment.
Depriving the bronchial muscles of one side of the lungs of their motor innervation does not interfere with sensitization nor the production of the typical anaphylactic lung. There is, therefore, direct sensitization of the muscle substance. Complete degeneration of the vagus nerve, after sensitization has occurred, interferes in no appreciable way with the course of immediate anaphylaxis. Partial degeneration of the vagus nerve, so that the bronchodilator fibers are still physiologically active, after sensitization has taken place, exerts no effect on the symptoms and lung picture of immediate anaphylaxis (very acute anaphylaxis with death after some minutes). No definite evidence was obtained regarding the function of the motor nerve endings in the bronchial muscles in anaphylaxis. The two sides of the lungs in immediate anaphylaxis may occasionally be unequal; when this occurs, the left side, especially the lower lobe, is usually fuller than the right side.
Pure cultures of an acid-fast bacillus were cultivated upon special media from the human tissues in four cases of leprosy. The nature of the growth, morphological characters and tinctorial properties do not differ for any of the cultures and correspond closely to the bacilli in the human leprous tubercles. That the bacillus of leprosy will multiply and continue to do so indefinitely outside of the animal body was first demonstrated by Clegg who cultivated an acid-fast organism from leprosy tissue in the presence of ameba and their symbiotics. Not only have I been able to confirm Clegg's work, but in addition I have succeeded in growing the bacillus in pure culture and in reproducing the disease in the Japanese dancing mouse, thereby establishing its identity. This species of animal acquires the infection in four to six weeks after intraperitoneal or subcutaneous inoculation with either emulsions of fresh leprous tissue or the pure cultures of B. leprae. Comparatively few bacilli are necessary to infect the mouse; and the mode of inoculation does not seem to make any appreciable difference in respect to the nature and time of development of the lesion. The experimental lesions are proliferative in character and identical with those in the human subject. Macroscopically they appear as glistening, white nodules which, in the early stages of development, resemble miliary tubercles. In my experience neither the cultures nor the bacilli directly from the human tissues have shown any evidence of multiplication or given rise to lesions when injected into the ordinary laboratory animals such as guinea pigs, rabbits, gray and white mice and rats, although repeated attempts have been made to infect these animals. B. leprae will not only multiply but it will colonize on a plain agar medium seeded with a pure culture of encysted ameba (Plate LVIII, Fig. 5), and upon an agar or banana medium prepared with a I per cent. solution of cystein and tryptophane. Colonization occurs in the form of glistening, white colonies, one to two millimeters in diameter, in from one to two months incubation. The bacilli in cultures are at all times acid-fast and differ only in morphology from those of the tissues in that they exhibit a greater variation in the distribution of the chromatin and are longer and more distinctly curved. To prove that the cultures obtained from the human tissues of these four cases are leprosy bacilli and not some other acid-fast species, the following facts are offered: (1) the growth features are distinctive and multiplication takes place only under special conditions of temperature and medium; (2) the complete correspondence in tinctorial properties and similarity in morphology to those in the tissues; (3) the failure to multiply or produce lesions in the common laboratory animals; and (4) the growth of the bacilli and the production of typical leprous lesions in the Japanese dancing mouse. The successful cultivation of B. leprae and the fact that the cultures retain pathogenic properties are of commanding importance in respect to a possible production of an artificial immune serum for combating the infection in man. Work along this interesting line is already in progress in our laboratories.
In this paper is reported the first avian tumor that has proved transplantable to other individuals. It is a spindle-celled sarcoma of the hen, which thus far has been propagated into its fourth tumor generation. This was accomplished by the use of fowls of pure blood from the small, intimately related stock in which the growth occurred. Market-bought fowls of similar variety have shown themselves insusceptible, as have fowls of mixed breed, pigeons and guinea-pigs. The percentage of successful transplantations has been small, but in the individuals developing a tumor its growth has been fairly rapid. Young chickens are more susceptible than adults. The reinoculation of negative fowls has never resulted in a growth. Throughout, the sarcoma has remained true to type. It is infiltrative and destructive. Metastasis has been observed once (to the heart). Experiments to determine whether the growth may be transmitted by cell-fragments have not yet been made. Repeated bacteriological examinations have yielded negative results. In its general behavior, so far as tested, this avian tumor closely resembles the typical mammalian neoplasms that are transplantable.
We agree with Jores and others that not one but many factors may be at work leading to intimal hyperplasia. Among these factors may be mentioned infection, bacterial toxins, organic poisons, inflammation and increased arterial tension. The theory of Thoma that the connective tissue developed in the intima is compensatory cannot be sustained. From the evidence which we have at hand it is not possible to state that the proliferative changes in the intima are uniformly secondary to the weakening of the media. Common influences may act simultaneously upon the media and the intima. Progressive medial degeneration of the peripheral arteries (Moenckeberg's sclerosis) is the result of muscle fatigue coupled with nutritional disturbance.
In the vast majority of cases examined in this laboratory the result of the Wassermann test was simply confirmatory of the clinical findings, but there were numerous suspicious cases, or cases in which symptoms were present and the patient denied a specific history, in which the test was of the greatest value, and it is in such instances, perhaps, that it may be regarded as "the court of last resort " in arriving at a conclusion regarding the nature of the condition present. Certainly if there is any value in experience and statistics, we are justified in regarding this test as the most valuable means we possess of diagnosing lues, and our experience with the Noguchi modification of the test has justified all that has been claimed for that method. We believe that our results have proven that by the use of the complement fixation test in the military service it is possible to prevent the enlistment of men suffering from latent lues who would otherwise be enlisted; to control specific treatment by using it as an index of the efficiency of such treatment; to clear up the diagnosis of obscure or suspicious cases; and to enable the surgeon to avoid mistakes in discharges for disability in cases suspected of this disease. Owing to the facility with which clinical observations can be made in armies, and the control that is possible of tested individuals, it is to be hoped that the Noguchi modification of the complement fixation test will be more widely used than it has been in the military services, for which we believe it is especially adapted. So far as we are aware the Medical Department of our army is the first to adopt this test as a routine diagnostic procedure and to apply it in the case of applicants for enlistment.
1. Nearly all livers at autopsy contain fat which is histologically demonstrable. 2. Fatty substances in the liver appear chiefly in two forms, as small granules and as globules of various sizes. 3. We suppose that granules indicate the (protoplasmic) change commonly spoken of as fatty degeneration, and that globules of small size are excess of fat, stored up by reason of some pathological change which may be merely temporary. 4. Fat is oftenest central, least often in the mid-zone. 5. A heavy deposit of fat is compatible with a competent liver. 6. Intense fattiness, generally globular, occurs with intoxications of bacterial and chemical nature, as well as in cases where a complex toxin is manufactured by the body-cells. 7. Granular fat occurs oftener than globular: it affects most often the central zone; globular affects most often the peripheral. 8. " Accidental " masses of globular fat are found at times, and appear to follow no rule of position: these are comparable to lipomata, which are evidently the result of a pathological process. 9. We found no deposit of fat characteristic of uremia. 10 We know of no analysis of the liver fats in the granular and globular states respectively: it seems to have been taken for granted that the deposits were one and the same. To determine the relationship, if any, between these two forms should be the basis of investigation.
Bicarbonate of soda fed in varying quantities over a period of months has no direct effect upon the catalytic activity of the blood. When fed to rabbits, it invariably causes a slight albuminuria and occasional casts. The kidneys of pregnant animals, especially in the later stages of pregnancy, seem to be more susceptible to this salt, and in some instances there may be complete suppression of urine followed by death. In these cases there is a decline in the catalytic activity of the blood similar to that observed in cases of acute nephritis, following the administration of uranium nitrate. The subcutaneous injection of salts is impracticable on account of the slow absorption. In intravenous injections it is important to make observations during the injection and at short intervals after the injection has been discontinued, since there is a rapid compensation on the part of the organism with a return of the normal catalytic activity of the blood. The simple diluting effect brought about by the injection of distilled water into the circulation manifests itself as a slight transitory decrease in the catalytic activity of the blood. This must be taken into consideration when estimating the effect of the injection of solutions of salt upon the catalase of the blood. Salts, such as sodium chloride, sodium bicarbonate, sodium sulphate and potassium iodide, acids, such as sulphuric, and alkalies, such as sodium hydrate, cause a definite decrease in the catalytic activity of the blood. This decrease varies directly with the concentration of the salt. The organism compensates rapidly and brings about a return to the normal activity. This compensation becomes less and less complete as larger quantities or repeated infusions are made. For example, twenty cubic centimeters of a five per cent. bicarbonate of soda solution causes a marked fall in the catalytic action of the blood. This is rapidly recovered from in from one to five minutes, and then a much more marked fall in the activity, requiring a longer time for compensation, occurs after the injection of six cubic centimeters of the same solution. It is of interest to note that sodium sulphate and potassium iodide, which have been shown to accelerate the catalytic activity of liver extract in the test-tube, have an inhibiting effect on the action of the blood when injected intravenously. This is only another instance of the dangers to be encountered from the immediate application of test-tube experiments to the living organism. The inhalation of carbon dioxide gas, even until convulsions are manifested, is without effect on the catalytic activity of the blood. On the other hand, there is a definite decline in this activity following the administration of illuminating gas. In this respect our results are directly at variance with those of Jolles.
Nitrogen equivalent to about 35 per cent of the nitrogen intake, though not necessarily derived directly from it, is daily secreted in the succus entericus in dogs on a mixed diet; about 10 per cent is excreted in the feces. and about 25 per cent is reabsorbed. The amount of reabsorbed nitrogen-containing material is considerably larger if the bile and pancreatic secretion are included. The metabolic significance of this reabsorption can only be surmised. That it is probably of great importance is indicated by the fact that in the experiments here recorded the amount of nitrogen reabsorbed equaled approximately 25 per cent of the nitrogen intake.
Injections of adrenalin or other substances into the lumbar muscles of rabbits are followed by a rapid absorption in whole or in part of these substances. The rapid absorption is not due to the needle being within a vein or to the tearing of veins by the needle during its insertion. Similar injections into gluteal muscles fail to give reliable results.
1. About 19 per cent. of the dry weight of the normal pig testicle is fatty matter. Histologically this fat occurs largely in the cells of the seminal tubules, and especially in the Sertoli cells. 2. During spermatogenesis the fat of the Sertoli cell passes inward for the nutrition of the spermatids and spermatozoa. During this passage its character is altered from a neutral fat to a lipoid. 3. About 30 per cent. of the dry weight of the cryptorchid pig testicle is fatty material. Histologically this fat lies within the seminal tubules, partially filling the Sertoli cells. The spermatogenic cells have completely disappeared. 4. We conclude that the presence of such an excessive amount of fat in the cryptorchid testicle is due to the absence of the spermatogenic cells which normally utilize during their development the fat furnished by the Sertoli cells.
In the cultivation of Bacillus leprae the initial multiplication outside the body cannot be obtained unless amino-acids are present in the medium. The amino-acids are believed to be essential nutritives for the initial growth of the organisms. It has been demonstrated that the primary growth of the leprosy bacilli occurs only in the presence of the products of tryptic digestion. Hence, putrefactive and other bacteria which are capable of splitting nucleo-proteids into their end acid products are, in consequence, of value in the isolation and cultivation of the leprosy bacilli. Amebae are not necessary for securing the primary multiplication of the leprosy bacilli upon artificial media and are detrimental since they feed with avidity upon the bacilli themselves. Two methods may be employed for recovering in culture Bacillus leprae from the tissues. In one (the direct), tryptophane or a mixture of albumen and trypsin are employed with a culture medium; in the other (indirect), bacterial species capable of digesting the albumen constituent of the culture medium are introduced into the medium. In both, the end result is identical, since they both provide for the presence of the amino-acids in the medium, without which the primary multiplication of the leprosy bacilli cannot be secured.
The thyroid gland of mammals can be cultivated outside the body. The proliferated elements consist of connective tissue and epithelial cells, the former predominating. The cells survive in cultures for two weeks or longer, which period can be increased by secondary and sometimes by tertiary cultivations. It is to be noted that the method of growing in vitro organs such as the thyroid gland may come to be used with advantage in the study of the substances concerned with the internal secretion of certain glands.
1. Intravascular agglutination can occur, and is the probable cause of occasional untoward symptoms, or even death, following transfusion of agglutinative blood. In the majority of cases, however, it does not occur, or if it does, it causes no symptoms. This is dependent on the influence of three factors: (1) concentration of the agglutinin; (2) absorption of the agglutinin by an excess of agglutinable cells; (3) interference with agglutination by an excess of non-agglutinable cells, so that when clumps occur they are microscopic in size. 2. If, for a given transfusion, a non-agglutinative donor, i. e., a donor whose blood is of the same agglutinative class as the patient's, can not be obtained, then it is safer to use a person whose serum is agglutinative toward the patient's cells than one whose cells are agglutinated by the patient's serum. 3. Tests for agglutination, as well as for hemolysis, ought to be made before transfusion. When time does not permit this, one has to weigh the possible dangers of agglutination or hemolysis against the dangers of letting the patient go without transfusion. 4. Agglutinable cells when transfused are taken up by the phagocytes in the patient's blood; and, for this reason) the transfusion of agglutinable blood, even when no accident happens, can be expected to do little permanent good.
In a series of observations upon the thyroids of brook trout, extending from the time of hatching to fish of four or more years old, we have been able to follow step by step the development of thyroid hyperplasia. In these hatchery trout, thyroid overgrowth may be recognized anatomically at the end of the second month of extra-oval life. Under the conditions in which these fish live, the thyroid overgrowth progressively increases, at first filling the aortic space and then invading the surrounding bone and muscle. In our series, this extension into the adjacent tissues was not recognizable until the fourth month of extra-oval life. The time when invasion of the surrounding tissues is first noticed is, of course, subject to great variation in different years and different hatcheries, depending on the general hygienic conditions, food, water supply, etc. If the growth continues, as it usually does, throughout the rapid growing period of the fish, it may first be detected clinically by a reddening of the pharyngeal floor as the thyroid tissue spreads to the submucosa. Later, definite external goitres appear ventrally. These may be present as early as the sixth month of life. The thyroid being, as in mammals, most active during the growing period, the greatest number of visible goitres appear during the second and third years of life. In older fish the thyroid again becomes less active and there is a tendency toward spontaneous recovery. There is no noteworthy change in the anatomical appearance of the thyroid growth, whether seen in very young or in older fish, other than that clearly dependent on the age of the fish, mechanical factors, as size of the goitre, and complicating factors, as infection, hemorrhage, degeneration, etc. There exists, therefore, no anatomical basis for the diagnosis of cancer in the older fish that is not also present in the youngest fish with thyroid hyperplasia. All the appearances of invasion, atypical cell growth, etc. are the results of the progressive growth and consequent extension of a non-encapsulated epithelial tissue along the paths of least resistance. In many of the larger goitres there are more or less distinct areas of thyroid hyperplasia, histologically different from the surrounding thyroid tissue, which we look upon as benign tumors comparable to the benign tumors seen in human goitres. We class them as tumors because they do not react with iodin as does the ordinary hyperplasia. To call these tumors cancer is going beyond our present knowledge and is unjustified, even though analogy with mammalian tumors suggests that certain ones might proceed to true carcinomata. The most common type of the benign tumors is the arborescent-papillomatous form and its many modifications. Infection is a frequent complication in the larger goitres, for the reasons given. It is necessary to recognize this factor in interpreting the histological conditions met with, as otherwise, using mammalian standards, some of the appearances observed could easily be mistaken for sarcoma. The effect of iodin on the thyroid hyperplasia has been studied in the early, middle, and late stages. All stages react with iodin, the mild degrees seemingly more rapidly than the severer degrees. Thus the early stages undergo involution in from two to three weeks, while the late stages may require one to two months. The process, therefore, is slower than the iodin reaction time in mammalian hyperplasia. True tumors do not react with iodin as does ordinary hyperplasia. Infection or other complication modifies the reaction. The reaction with iodin is a specific test for functional hyperplasia of the thyroid. As we have not been able to find any stage in the process that does not react with iodin, we must conclude that there is none that may be looked upon biologically as cancer. Just as iodin invariably stops the hyperplasia and causes the thyroid to return to the colloid or resting state (from which it may undergo hyperplasia a second, third, or more times, exactly as in mammals), so also spontaneous involution occurs when the fish are transferred to a natural environment. This spontaneous involution has been followed in experiments and has been seen in examples taken at random from the streams. We have never seen an exception to this rule, save in the case of true tumors. As pointed out above, recovery does not imply a disappearance of the goitre; it implies a cessation of growth and return of the active hyperplasia to the colloid or resting stage. Thyroid hyperplasia is a compensatory reaction, the exact cause of which is still to be sought. There is no evidence that in fish or in man it is either infectious or contagious. All the biological data at present available favor the view that fish goitre in common with mammalian goitre is the symptomatic manifestation of a metabolic and nutritional disturbance. There are three major conditions which, in some way still obscure, influence the thyroid growth; namely, a limited water supply, overcrowding, and overfeeding with a highly artificial and incomplete food. The water of the hatchery observed is not intrinsically goitre-producing, as the fish will not develop goitre unless at least the factor of overfeeding with an incomplete food operates at the same time. On the other hand, they recover if the overfeeding and overcrowding are corrected, although they remain in the same water. Therefore it seems probable that the food is the major factor acting to bring about a fault of nutrition favorable for goitre development. It is impossible at this time to suggest what elements in the food may be at fault, whether, for example, it is deficiency or excess or disproportion in the relative food values.
1. It has been shown that hemoglobin in solution or within the red blood corpuscles can be oxidized by hydrogen peroxid to form a colorless substance capable of manifesting a microchemical reaction for iron, the type of the reaction depending upon the degree of oxidation. 2. It has been further shown that hematin and hemin, when treated with hydrogen peroxid, are decolorized. The colorless or nearly colorless body, preserving the form of the original body and being an intermediate product of its oxidation, will also exhibit a typical reaction for iron. 3. A method has been described for obtaining microchemical reaction for iron from hemoglobin and its various modifications and iron-containing derivatives, from tissue cells, from cell nuclei, and from eosinophil granules, by an appropriate degree of oxidation with hydrogen peroxid.
This investigation is very limited and the number of patients treated is few, yet the following conclusions may not be amiss:- 1. The vaccine in no instance did harm, and the reactions in the majority were very mild and of short duration. 2. Cases in which bacteriologically B. dysenteriae were proved to be present, but in a clinically unrecognizable form, were not affected differently from those which were culturally negative. This may in part be due to the fact that this mode of vaccination produces an immediate passive immunity, while the bacterial vaccine is producing an active immunity. 3. The work is of interest and holds out a possible means of preventing the great mortality from infantile dysentery during the summer months.
1. The transplantable sarcomata of rats and mice grow very readily by the method of cultivating tissues in vitro. 2. Sarcomatous tissue grows in conformity to a type which may be regarded as characteristic for tissues of mesenchymal origin. 3. The growth of sarcoma cells in vitro consists in ameboid wandering into the surrounding plasma, karyokinetic proliferation. and evidences of active metabolism on the part of the cells. 4. Mouse carcinomata can be cultivated in vitro. The outgrowth of carcinoma cells assumes a sheet-like form, only one cell in thickness. They migrate into the plasma by ameboid movement, the advancing edge showing numerous prolongations of the cytoplasm into pseudopods. 5. Karyokinetic figures are frequently seen in growing carcinoma cells. The cells show evidences of active metabolism. 6. Both sarcoma and carcinoma cells cultivated in vitro show active phagocytosis; carmin particles placed in the plasma are taken up rapidly by the growing cells.
1. Sarcoma cultivated in plasma from immune animals grows quite as vigorously as in plasma from normal and tumor-bearing animals, thus affording further proof of the absence of specific cytolytic substances in the body fluids of animals immune to transplantable cancer. 2. Animals may be successfully inoculated with sarcoma cultivated in vitro, although, in the case of rat sarcoma, there is evidence of diminished virulence. 3. Subcultures of sarcoma cultivated in vitro may be made by transferring to fresh plasma the original piece of tissue, or a portion of the outgrowth. The duration of life of sarcoma cells under these conditions seems dependent only on a renewal of the medium.
Grouped isoagglutination is not limited to man, but is much more widespread than has been hitherto suspected. It occurs in the bloods of steers and rabbits. It seems probable that it will be found to occur in the bloods of other animals. Just how many of the isoagglutinins and the isoagglutinable substances in different species are respectively identical is still to be determined. The work is being continued with other animals.
Strychnin and adrenalin when injected into cardiectomized frogs are efficiently distributed all over the animal body and when administered in sufficient quantities produce the usual reactions of these alkaloids. The experiments with strychnin prove positively that the paralysing effect of this poison is due to its direct action upon the nerve cells of the cord, and not, as Verworn assumes, to a paralysing action upon the heart. When morphin is injected into cardiectomized frogs the effects are much greater and incomparably more rapid than when administered to a normal frog. The normal circulation probably contains substances derived from some organs capable of modifying and retarding the specific effects of morphin. The distribution of solutions in animals deprived of their circulatory apparatus takes place through the tissue spaces, which present a more or less well connected system of communications throughout the entire animal body, especially through its peripheral parts. This mode of distribution is designated as the peripheral mechanism. In contrast to the centralizing cardiovascular apparatus, the peripheral mechanism permits a greater autonomous action of organs and a more localising effect of injections. The peripheral mechanism found to be active in animals deprived of their circulation is probably identical with the mechanism which serves for distribution of the mesolymph in living animals not yet possessing a circulatory apparatus. The existence of the peripheral mechanism in animals with a cardiovascular apparatus possesses probably a phylogenetic significance. It is assumed that the activity of the peripheral mechanism is probably not completely suppressed even in the presence of a normally acting circulatory apparatus; that it exerts a greater physiological influence in parts in which the circulation is normally some-what difficult; and that it unfolds an activity in pathological conditions in which the circulation has been eliminated or reduced in some parts of the body, or in which the energy of the entire circulation has been reduced.
It may be concluded that the degree of dilution of the culture medium has a marked influence on the rate of growth of splenic tissue. The maximum acceleration was obtained in a medium composed of three volumes of normal plasma and two volumes of distilled water. The growth in this hypotonic plasma was very much larger than in normal plasma. On the contrary, the growth of the spleen in hypertonic plasma was always less than in normal plasma. In other experiments, we found that in diluted plasma there was also an acceleration of the growth of the skin, the heart, and the liver of chickens. The skin of adult frogs also grew more actively in this plasma. The optimum degree of dilution varied according to the nature of the tissues and to the species of the animals. While the plasma containing two fifths distilled water produced the largest growth of splenic tissue, a slightly less diluted medium was more favorable for the liver and the heart, and generally for the skin also. The action of hypertonic plasma varied also in a large measure. While the spleen did not grow at all in the medium containing 0.0124 and 0.0144 sodium chlorid, the skin, on the other hand, could stand a high concentration of the sodium chlorid. Even its growth was activated in media containing 0.0094 and 0.0124 sodium chlorid and was greater than with normal plasma. The spleen of kittens was very easily affected by the changes of the dilution of the plasma, while the skin of the frog presented its best growth in plasma containing one half distilled water. Marked variations in the sensitiveness of tissues to hypertonic and hypotonic media will probably be observed in animals of different species. From these experiments, three conclusions can be drawn: namely, that certain laws of growth, discovered by Loeb, in lower organisms are true also for higher organisms; that normal plasma is not the optimum medium for the growth of tissue; and that each tissue has probably its optimum medium. The growth of the spleen is, without doubt, considerably modified by the variations of the dilution and perhaps of the osmotic tension of the plasma. It is possible then that the influence of osmotic tension, discovered by Loeb, in the growth of certain organisms, is a general law applicable as well to higher forms of life- frogs, cats, and chickens-as to lower organisms-tubularia and sea-urchins. In placing tubularia in different dilutions of sea-water and distilled water, Loeb found that the greatest rate of regeneration was observed when two volumes of distilled water were added to three volumes of sea-water. But fertilized eggs of sea-urchins were more sensitive to the action of hypertonic plasma, and they all died in a dilution of sea-water with two fifths distilled water. If only one fifth distilled water was added to the sea-water they developed normally. We found that the cells of certain tissues of the chicken follow a similar rule, since the maximal growth of the spleen is obtained in plasma containing two fifths distilled water, while other tissues grow better in a less hypotonic medium. Normal plasma is certainly not the ideal medium for the growth of tissues, since slight modifications of the tension, the alkalinity, or the addition of certain inorganic salts to normal plasma, increase the rate of the growth of tissues.
Before proceeding to a discussion of the experiments upon cold-blooded animals, it is necessary to review briefly some of the work recently done with the bacillus of leprosy. The appearance of the bacillus in man and its behavior under artificial cultivation, and in the tissues of lower animals, should be considered in order that comparisons may be drawn. In their studies with the organism under cultivation, Duval and Gurd pointed out that the long, slender, and beaded appearance of the leprosy bacillus described by Hansen, in 1872, is lost when removed for several generations from the parent stem, and under artificial cultivation the organism becomes unbeaded, short, and coccoid. Duval also noted that these changes in morphology were always followed by rapid multiplication of the organism. Duval argues, a priori, that the bacillus is not in a favorable environment in the human tissues. If these deductions are correct, the morphology of the leprosy bacillus should vary according to the resistance offered by the tissues of different animals. The resistance of the human host to the leprosy bacillus becomes more evident in the light of the clinical aspect of the disease. The long period of incubation, the duration of the disease, and the disappearance of the bacilli preceding the healing of the infected foci show that the resistance offered to the bacillus by the human tissues is not to be overestimated. This opinion is confirmed when the behavior of the leprosy bacillus under cultivation and in the tissues of various mammals is compared. When cats, rabbits, bats, guinea pigs, and rats are inoculated either below the skin or into the peritoneal cavity with large quantities of Bacillus leprae, a slight local reaction follows within twenty-four to forty-eight hours, but no definite lesions are produced and the bacilli soon disappear. The resistance of some animals to Bacillus leprae is well illustrated by two cats which were inoculated subcutaneously and intraperitoneally with a heavy suspension of Bacillus leprae. These animals were killed and examined three days later, but the bacilli were not demonstrable from the regions about the sites of inoculation. Pigeons are likewise refractory. It is impossible to cause a local reaction in these birds, and the injected bacilli disappear rapidly. Hence, probably no multiplication takes place in them. Goats, young pigs, and white and dancing mice are in a degree susceptible to injections, and though undoubted lesions are produced, and multiplication of the bacilli occurs, the lesions and bacilli disappear after a limited time. Acid-fast bacilli which are recovered from the lesions are long, slim, and beaded, though the organisms used in the inoculations were short, unbeaded, and coccoid. Monkeys inoculated with cultures of the short unbeaded forms react promptly. The lesions resulting, though confined in most instances to the site of inoculation, occasionally appear at distant points. The number of bacilli present in the nodules and their arrangement within typical lepra cells show that multiplication has taken place. The organism has, however, changed from the short coccoid form to the long, slender, beaded form. Though the lesions induced and the bacilli present are in every way similar to those found in man, their tendency to disappear gradually after a quiescent stage clearly denotes that the tissues of the monkey, although less refractory than the tissues of the animals previously mentioned, still offer resistance to invasion. While mammals react but poorly to inoculations of the leprosy bacillus, this reaction manifests itself in various ways in different species. For example, while multiplication of the organism with the production of lesions occurs in some species, in others that are more refractory, the injected bacilli assume the involuted or beaded forms and do not multiply or produce lesions; in others, still more resistant to the action of the leprosy bacillus, the organisms quickly undergo granular metamorphosis and disappear. Furthermore, in some species the lesions are, in most instances, limited to the site of inoculation, and though presenting all the characteristics of the lesion in man, the nodules and the bacilli disappear after a variable time. This behavior of the leprosy bacillus can be accounted for only by the degree of resistance offered by the tissues of the individual host. Since the morphology of the organism invariably changes from the short coccoid to the large beaded form when placed in insusceptible animals, and conversely, from the long beaded forms to the short coccoid forms when placed in susceptible animals, the deduction can be drawn that the organism varies in morphology and rapidity of growth according to the susceptibility of the host. Examples of similar behavior of Bacillus leprae in the human subject are known to all investigators of leprosy. Ulcers and nodular areas often heal, and the bacilli disappear with little or no treatment. It is true that while older lesions are healing, new ones are constantly appearing, yet the duration of the disease and its undoubted tendency towards healing shows that conditions in the human subject are variable, and suggests that the organism has its natural habitat in some other host. The experiments presented here serve to show that the bacillus of leprosy meets but little or no resistance in the tissues of cold-blooded animals, multiplies in their tissues, and may be harbored by them without apparent discomfort or external evidence of the disease. That no appreciable resistance is offered to the multiplication of the leprosy bacillus by many species of cold-blooded animals is shown by the fact that aside from the trauma produced by the inoculation and the slight initial reaction of the tissues, the organism continues to grow profusely, and to invade the tissues without further reaction. Quite the opposite condition occurs in mammals: in some of these the leprosy bacillus degenerates into a granular mass shortly after inoculation; in others that are less refractory, typical lesions appear, but they seldom extend from the point of inoculation; and while the bacilli multiply slowly, they do not infiltrate the tissues, but disappear after a short time, the lesions healing. That multiplication of Bacillus leprae occurs in the tissues of cold-blooded animals is shown by the fact that while animals examined a few days after inoculation show but a few scattered organisms, those killed at longer intervals show a proportional increase in the number of bacilli. Furthermore, the few bacilli found at the early-period are extracellular and scattered, while after longer periods they tend to be massed and enclosed in large lepra cells. The supposition that these lepra cells are phagocytes has naturally arisen. Duval holds that they are not phagocytes in the true sense of the term, that the bacilli penetrate the cells rather than that the cells engulf them, after which, finding conditions for growth favorable, they multiply without causing serious injury to the cell. The size of the cell depends upon the size of the colony within. The experimental work bears out this view since the decrease in number of the organisms observed in animals killed shortly after inoculation depends not upon phagocytic action nor upon cells which appear later when active lesions are established. In early lesions, the lepra cells are smaller, barely measuring twenty to thirty microns in diameter, and contain but few bacilli; whereas in older ones, they attain a diameter of 100 microns or even more, and contain enormous numbers of bacilli. Were this increase in size due to phagocytic action, some cells would be found in which the limit of their capacity had been reached; and they would either contain a mass of dead and disintegrated bacteria or would themselves show evidence of disintegration. On the contrary, the bacilli, though they occupy most of the cell, show no signs of disintegration, and the nucleus and the cytoplasm of the cell retain normal staining properties. That the invasion and multiplication of the bacilli cause an irritation is evident by the amitotic divisions of the nucleus which occur in the larger cells. The absence of external evidence of invasion by Bacillus leprae in cold-blooded animals, and the apparent lack of discomfort caused by the presence of the organism within their tissues, are points which should be remembered in considering the sources from which leprosy may be transmitted. In not a single instance in the numerous experiments presented here would it have been possible, from any external sign, to suspect that the animals were harboring multitudes of leprosy bacilli. While the evidence in support of the opinion that leprosy may be transmitted from man to man appears sufficiently strong to warrant this belief, the number of cases in which infection can be actually traced to this source is small. Since leprosy is known to be prevalent where fish and sea-food are plentiful, and since the experiments here recorded prove that fish can be infected by being fed cultures of Bacillus leprae, or nodules from human lepers, or bits of fish previously infected with the leprosy organism, account should be taken of the possibility that leprosy, in certain localities, may arise from this source of infection. The question as to how and from what source leprosy bacilli enter the human body may be still regarded as an open one. Isolated examples of direct infection of healthy human beings from lepers have been reported by Arning and Nonne, by Manson, and others. The notion that the agency of infection is already infected human beings, that is lepers, is at the foundation of the modern practice of the isolation and segregation of lepers, which would seem to have brought about a definite decrease in the prevalence of the disease. (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED)
Small encapsulated tumors of the size of peas, or even smaller, are occasionally found in the pancreas. These tumors are benign, and have a structure similar in all respects to that of an hypertrophied island of Langerhans. The distinctions between adenomata and forms of regenerative hypertrophy, sometimes so difficult to make in the breast, prostate, liver, and other organs, is not easily drawn in the present case. The fact that one may encounter all gradations in the size of islands, from that of the normal island to that of the tumors, suggests that it is more reasonable to consider such tumors merely as hypertrophied islands rather than as adenomata originating from islands.
The foregoing experiments clearly justify the following conclusions :- Intratracheal insufflation protects the respiratory tract very efficiently against any invasion from the pharynx. The filling up of the pharynx with extraneous material, whether it be from the stomach or from the mouth, brings no danger to the trachea and bronchi. This holds true even if the animal is under deep anesthesia. On the other hand, the presence of a tube in the trachea or larynx without the protection of an effective recurrent air stream, definitely facilitates the entrance of foreign material from the pharynx into the trachea. Anesthesia, which removes the protective action of deglutition, greatly increases the danger from aspiration in these cases.
These experiments have shown that salvarsan is a comparatively inactive drug when applied directly to nerve and muscle tissue of the frog. In perfusion experiments with alkaline solutions, no detrimental action whatever was to be seen either upon direct or indirect irritability. In bathing .experiments, in which the concentration of the salvarsan in the various solutions was surely much higher than that in which it reaches the peripheral tissues in the human subject through the circulation, the loss of irritability occurred only after a long period of exposure to the drug.
1. In our examinations, only 38 per cent. of the infections of the respiratory tract below the glottis were pure, and this percentage was reached only by carefully following Kitasato's method of handling sputa. 2. Lobar pneumonia may produce sputum free from pneumococci, and may undoubtedly be caused by organisms other than thepneumococcus. 3. There is found a marked yearly variation in the organisms which excite inflammation of the respiratory tract. 4. Micrococcus catarrhalis is usually considered a common secondary invader; but it may, and probably frequently does, assume pathogenic properties.
In hearts showing auricular fibrillation mechanical stimulation of the right vagus nerve causes, as a rule, marked slowing or stoppage of ventricular rhythm, without producing any appreciable effect in the electrocardiographic record of the auricular fibrillation. The ventricular pauses are apparently due to the blocking of stimuli from the auricles. The force of ventricular systole is distinctly weakened for several beats after vagus stimulation, and ectopic ventricular systoles have been seen in several instances, apparently the result of the vagus action. There may, in some cases, be lowered excitability of the ventricles, while no constant change is seen in the size of the electrical complexes representing ventricular systole.
The Wassermann reaction in scarlet fever per se is uniformly negative. The antigen of scarlet fever liver yields practically the same results as that of luetic liver, and both fail to deviate complement with scarlet fever antibodies. The Noguchi reaction in scarlet fever is practically negative. Sixteen cases, or 6.4 per cent. of 250 cases, were positive when active serum was used; with inactivated serum, but eleven, or 4.4 per cent., remained positive. Five of these eleven cases were also positive with the Wassermann system. In other words, sixteen cases, or 6.4 per cent., were positive according to the Noguchi system with active or inactivated serum or both, whereas with the Wassermann system only 2 per cent. were positive. The presence of anti-sheep hemolysin normally in human serum is one of the main disturbing factors in the Wassermann system; for this reason, complement and hemolysin (made by immunization of rabbits) require careful titration. A positive Wassermann reaction usually indicates the presence of syphilitic antibodies, and a negative Noguchi reaction, their absence, and both systems should be used in the examination of all cases.
The intravenous infusion of 0.5 per cent. acid "606" causes a weakening of the heart which is usually fatal. The intravenous infusion of 0.5 per cent. alkaline "606" causes no marked apparent effect upon the heart, but its factors of safety may be so reduced in some instances that a slight extra strain produces fibrillation and death.
In the test tube, sodium linoleate and sodium linolenate kill and dissolve virulent pneumococci more rapidly and in higher dilutions than sodium oleate; otherwise their action is the same. The intensity of action on the cocci is directly proportional to the degree of unsaturation of the acid. Blood serum inhibits the bacteriolytic and hemolytic action of unsaturated soaps partially or completely, according to definitive quantitative relations between serum and soap. Small quantities of serum completely inhibit the action of dilute soap solutions, but even whole serum does not prevent bacteriolysis and hemolysis by relatively concentrated soap solutions, i. e. 1 per cent. and 0.5 per cent. A given quantity of serum inhibits the action of the soaps in inverse ratio to their degree of unsaturation. The hemolytic and bacteriolytic action of soaps of the unsaturated fatty acids is probably due in part to their avidity for protein and not wholly to their ability to dissolve lipoids. Attempts to prevent serum inhibition of the lytic action of sodium linoleate and sodium linolenate were unsuccessful. The more unsaturated soaps are not as efficient in preventing fatal pneumococcic infection of animals as sodium oleate.
By repeatedly withdrawing, defibrinating, and reinjecting blood, the platelet count in dogs can be reduced to an extremely low level. When the reduction in platelets and fibrinogen has been carried to an extreme degree the animals display a marked tendency to bleed. The regeneration of platelets after their removal by defibrination is remarkably rapid and amounts, on an average, to about one fifth of the entire number in the blood per day. From the experiments and from observations on the platelet count in human beings, it is believed that under the usual conditions of life platelets are utilized or destroyed and replaced in enormous numbers daily, and that the life cycle of the platelet is extremely short,-possibly a matter of a few days.
The contents of the stomach and small intestine of normal rabbits, kept on a diet poor in easily convertible carbohydrates, when removed immediately after killing the animal (by clamping the trachea), usually contain a very small but measurable amount of dextrose (reducing substances). A preceding nephrectomy does not increase the amounts of the dextrose in these viscera. An intravenous injection of dextrose, if given in a sufficient quantity in a unit of time, causes a definite excretion, or increase of excretion, into the small intestine and the stomach. The amount of excretion, however, is incomparably smaller than the amount eliminated through the kidneys. A preceding double nephrectomy increases the gastro-intestinal elimination of the intravenously injected dextrose. The increase, however, is far too small to be considered in the light of a functional compensation for the loss of the considerable elimination through the kidneys.
THE FOLLOWING CONCLUSIONS MAY BE DRAWN FROM AN ANALYSIS OF THE PROTOCOLS: 1. The chlorin output is very much diminished during the process of experimental pneumonia in dogs (tables I and II). The quantity of chlorin retained in the cases with well developed exudates (table I) is much larger than the exudate could account for. 2. Turpentine pleurisy in dogs (tables III and IV) also is associated with a retention of chlorin, but this is not so marked as in pneumonia. There is no direct quantitative relation between the water output and the chlorin excretion. 3. The rabbits with pneumococcal septicemia (tables V and VI) did not retain chlorin in any phase of the disease, a fact which Hutchison has also noticed. It seems justifiable to conclude that the retention of chlorin in the organism in the course of pneumonia is conditioned by more than one factor. The formation of the exudate is one of these factors, but it alone is not capable of producing the same degree of chlorin retention as occurs in pneumonia. The additional factors are not yet determined; but it may be stated that the retention of chlorin is probably not due to the general effect of the pneumococcus on the organism or to its injury to the kidney. The principal cause of the retention seems, therefore, to be due to local changes associated with the pulmonary condition.
A few findings which seem to be of importance may be pointed out:- Table I shows the analytical figures of serum-albumin, serum-globulin, and fibrin of the normal dog. The main difference between albumin and globulin appears in the relation of the precipitable to the non-precipitable total nitrogen and amino-nitrogen. Precipitable total nitrogen as well as amino-nitrogen is considerably larger in the albumin than in the globulin. In the cases of uranium nitrate nephritis (table II), the important figures approximate very closely those of normal serum-albumin. The samples from dog 3, that had been poisoned at the same time with phosphorous oil and uranium nitrate, show relatively large variations as compared with the figures from specimens from the other dogs, chiefly as regards the amino-nitrogen distribution: i. e., in dog 3, (1) the amount of amino-nitrogen to the total nitrogen in the solution before precipitation is higher; (2) the percentage of precipitable amino-nitrogen is larger; and (3) the ratio of precipitable amino-nitrogen to precipitable total nitrogen exceeds that of the other cases. All these changes, together with the fact that the total precipitable nitrogen did not undergo any quantitative variation, suggest that in the case of dog 3 the analyzed material contained a higher amount of lysin or cystin. It may further be mentioned that the analytical figures in this case differ also from those of the normal serum-albumin and still more from those of the serum-globulin. These changes, however, were not found in the case of dog 4, although this animal was treated in the same manner as the preceding dog. In the cases of nephritis in man (table III), striking differences were met with in the case of acute scarlet fever nephritis (No. 1a) and in the case (No. 2) of a patient with chronic nephritis and Pott's disease. This patient died a few weeks after the specimen for analysis was collected. The autopsy showed a general amyloidosis. The variations in both cases consist in a lowering of the ratio of amino-nitrogen to total nitrogen in the solution before precipitation, and corresponding to this, a fall of the same ratio in the filterable nitrogen. Such a change points to a relatively larger amount of prolin and oxyprolin or tryptophan in these cases. As a whole, one may conclude that Van Slyke's method, carefully applied and sufficiently controlled, may also be used for the study of urinary albumin. The results already obtained indicate that definite differences in the composition of urinary "albumin" may be detected. As yet it is premature to establish a definite relationship between the chemical composition of the "albumin" and the clinical or pathological conditions under which it appears, but it seems hopeful that further work may lead to the finding of such a relationship.
The physiological study of experimental nephritis caused by poisons of bacterial origin demonstrates that the poisons may produce types of nephritis in which either vascular or tubular changes predominate. Diphtheria toxin produces a nephritis which in its late stage is of the vascular type, but in its early stage is distinctly tubular. Tuberculin and mallein uniformly cause lesions of the tubular type, which do not pass into the vascular type. Nephrotoxic and hemolytic immune sera cause changes in the kidneys which by physiological methods of observation present no evidence of vascular injury, but which are anatomically characterized by exudative glomerular lesions of moderate severity. This discrepancy between the results of anatomical and physiological study indicates that a lesion of the membrane controlling the passage of fluids may occur without alteration in the power of the vessels to contract and dilate. This fact is shown clearly by the lesion caused by hemolytic immune serum, which is in sharp contrast to the lesion caused by diphtheria toxin, since the latter substance not only alters the permeability of the membranes but also influences markedly the power of the vessels to contract and dilate. It is necessary therefore if the term "vascular" is used in its broadest sense, to recognize three types of vascular nephritis: (1) one in which little or no anatomical evidence of vascular injury is found, but in which physiological methods show profound vascular changes, as in arsenical nephritis; (2) one in which anatomical evidence of vascular (exudative) injury is prominent, but in which the physiological tests are negative, as in nephritis caused by a hemolytic immune serum; and (3) one in which both anatomical and physiological changes are prominent, as in diphtheria toxin nephritis.
1. Uranium and cantharidin, in the smallest doses capable of producing a distinct nephritis, tend to increase the elimination of nitrogen, probably by stimulating tissue katabolism. 2. Uranium, cantharidin, and potassium chromate, in larger doses, impair the power of the kidney to eliminate nitrogen; but this may not be evident unless the animal is on a high nitrogen diet, and the impairment, when due to potassium chromate, may not persist more than a day. 3. Small doses of uranium and of cantharidin cause a transient increase of chloride elimination which corresponds in a general way to the excess of diuresis. 4. Large doses of uranium and of chromate cause a fall, usually transient, in the chloride elimination. The chloride elimination may, however, be diminished forty per cent. for twenty-four hours without evidences of intoxication (vomiting). 5. The anatomic appearance of the kidney varies somewhat with the poison used and greatly with the period of survival after administration of the poison, but bears no definite relation to the nitrogen, chloride, or phenolsulphonephthalein elimination; marked anatomic alteration is compatible with normal elimination of all these substances and with freedom from symptoms of intoxication (vomiting). 6. The decrease in the elimination of phenolsulphonephthalein, which occurs in uranium, chromate, and cantharidin nephritides, and which, in a general way, is proportional to the dose of the poison, bears no constant relation to the changes in the nitrogen or chloride elimination. 7. A marked decrease in the elimination of the phenolsulphonephthalein occurs synchronously, as a rule, with the onset of the symptoms of intoxication (vomiting), and therefore the phenolsulphonephthalein test would seem to be a better indicator of the ability of the kidney to eliminate the toxic substance responsible for the symptoms of renal insufficiency than are either the anatomic changes or the elimination of total nitrogen or of chlorides.
1. The combination of a biological test object on which adrenalin causes contraction of smooth muscle (perfused blood-vessels or the uterus in certain conditions) with a biological test object on which it produces inhibition of contraction of smooth muscle (intestine) greatly diminishes the chance of error in testing blood (or other body liquids) for adrenalin. A control experiment with adrenalin solutions should, in general, accompany each observation on the blood. 2. When properly chosen biological tests are employed, no evidence is obtained of the presence of adrenalin in detectable amount in normal blood taken from the general circulation. 3. In a case of nephritis with albuminuria and persistently high arterial pressure, the pressure was diminished by forced breathing. The washing out of carbon dioxide seemed to be a factor in this diminution as well as the mechanical interference with the circulation. In this case, the administration of large doses of sodium bicarbonate was associated with a marked diminution in the blood pressure. 4. In another case with persistently high blood pressure, the drawing off of cerebrospinal fluid caused a distinct diminution in the arterial pressure, presumably by lowering the intracranial pressure. No pressor substance was detected in the cerebrospinal fluid.
From what has already been said, it is apparent that changes in respiration and blood pressure may be produced by stimulation of a very large portion of the optic thalamus; that no one region controls these phenomena; that the spleen shows variations in volume only when marked blood pressure changes occur, and that such a change has been observed on stimulation of many places in the thalamus. Furthermore, the regions in the thalamus from which such effects are obtained are those in which the large afferent paths end; namely, the fillet and superior cerebellar peduncle, and a region directly connected with the vagus nucleus. The portions of the thalamus which proved inert to stimulation were those which in our previous investigation also were inactive; namely, the median nucleus, and the upper anterior end of the lateral-the region through which the fibers of the median nucleus pass. These phenomena are similar in every respect to those observed when an afferent nerve is stimulated. In what has gone before, it has been shown that the respiratory and circulatory changes occurred when one of the sensory paths, or a path running directly to the medullary nuclei governing these functions was stimulated. In explaining these phenomena, therefore, there is no necessity for invoking the existence of special centers.
From results of which the foregoing data form a part, it appears that the amount of bacterial nitrogen in the feces is a valuable index to intestinal conditions, and the method herein described is a simple and satisfactory one for making this determination. It involves three serial centrifugalizations of a two gram sample of the fresh feces brought into suspension in 0.2 per cent. hydrochloric acid. The bacterial suspension finally obtained is concentrated and extracted by alcohol, and nitrogen is determined in the precipitated material. The complete data on a given stool can be obtained in about five days, and one operator can take care of three or four stools in duplicate in one day. On an absolutely uniform diet of simple and easily digested food during a period of three to four weeks, the average amount of bacterial nitrogen in two subjects was found to be 53.9 per cent. of the total fecal nitrogen, and this percentage, though higher than that obtained by workers heretofore, is probably more nearly a true value for bacterial nitrogen, because no ether extraction was employed. The average daily amount of dry bacteria, calculated on the basis of the nitrogen values, is 8.27 grams.
1. Theoretically, the method of cultivating tissues outside the body offers an ideal technique for the demonstration and study of cytotoxins. 2. Mouse sarcoma, which grows vigorously in the plasma of normal rats, shows little or no activity in the plasma of rats immunized by mouse sarcoma injections. 3. Rat sarcoma, readily cultivated in the plasma of normal guinea pigs, either remains quite inactive, or presents a feeble growth in the plasma of guinea pigs previously treated with rat tissues. 4. The inhibition of growth in cultures of rat and mouse sarcomata in plasma from animals of a foreign species immunized against these tissues, is due, in all probability, to the action of cytotoxins.
The study of a variety of experimental renal lesions in the dog demonstrates that the phenolsulphonephthalein test of Rowntree and Geraghty is one of the most satisfactory and at the same time most delicate methods of estimating the functional activity of the kidney. The elimination of the test dye is decreased in so-called spontaneous nephritis and in experimental nephritis due to potassium chromate, uranium nitrate, cantharidin, diphtheria toxin, and arsenic, and in those lesions caused by snake venom, hemolytic serum, prolonged renal anemia, and extensive reduction of the kidney substance. Its elimination is not' diminished, but is increased, in the presence of the renal lesion caused by nephrotoxic immune serum, and for this discrepancy no explanation is at hand. The test is a reliable method of demonstrating improvement in the functional activity of the kidney, as is shown in our study of spontaneous nephritis. The increased elimination of the dye occurring after small doses of various irritants, which is frequently characteristic of the early stages of a severe nephritis, and which is seen also several days after unilateral nephrectomy, would appear to have an important relation to the problem of kidney function; and although probably not of clinical importance, it is worthy of further study as a phase of renal activity.
Acute lethal anaphylaxis in the intact rabbit is caused by a failure of the heart. This failure of the heart is due to a change in the heart itself; it is peripheral and independent of the central nervous system for its production. This change in the heart is shown anatomically and functionally by decreased translucency, change in consistency, and by failure to respond to stimuli, and is probably to be classed as a chemical rigor. The rigor of the heart is most pronounced in the right ventricle, the wall of which may be gray, stiff, very tough to the finger nail, and non-irritable. Cardiac stimulants of the digitalis group seem to exert a harmful effect when injected in acute anaphylaxis. Blood coagulation is delayed; a loose clot forms after one half to two hours. Anti-anaphylaxis is produced when the animal does not succumb to the injection. When anaphylactic death is delayed for about one hour, a well developed rigor of the white muscles of the thigh, and of the diaphragm may occur while the animal is still alive. Reasons are brought forward to show the necessity of more caution in employing the word anaphylaxis. Friedberger's statement, that the lungs of guinea pigs dead from acute anaphylaxis are not characteristic of anaphylaxis for this animal, is shown to be baseless.
1. Hypertrophy of the islands of Langerhans occurs in two forms: (1) the simple type which is nothing more than an increase in size of preexisting islands; and (2) the columnar type, in which the islands are composed of anastomosing columns of cylindrical cells. 2. Regeneration of the islands of Langerhans takes place by means of a budding off of columnar cells from the ducts. The process is analogous to the development of the islands in the fetal pancreas. 3. Newly formed islands of Langerhans are composed of cylindrical cells similar in all respects to those constituting hypertrophied islands of the columnar type. The two structures are identical, the latter being a later phase of the former. 4. Newly formed islands of Langerhans are capable of a greater hypertrophy than prexisting islands. Both types of insular hypertrophy are usually of a compensatory character, the columnar, or regenerative type, being the more important. 5. Hypertrophy and regeneration of the islands of Langerhans occur most frequently in diabetes mellitus (34 per cent. of 100 cases studied). These changes are usually associated with sclerosis or hyaline degeneration of other islands. 6. Hypertrophy and regeneration of the islands of Langerhans are occasionally observed in cirrhosis and carcinoma of the pancreas. In some of the most advanced cases, however, the islands have been spared and neither hypertrophy nor regeneration are present. 7. Regeneration of the islands of Langerhans has been noted in five cases in which there was no evidence of diabetes and where the pancreas was for the most part normal. In four of these cases, columnar hypertrophy of the islands was also observed. All five cases were associated with abnormalities of the larger ducts-obstruction, chronic inflammation, and adenomatous proliferation of the lining epithelium. 8. The occurrence of hypertrophy and regeneration of the islands of Langerhans affords considerable evidence in favor of their anatomic and functional independence.
In nearly 50 per cent. of the cases, virulent trypanosome virus inoculated directly through the stomach wall of rats failed to infect these animals. The percentage of infections after inoculation of this kind seemed to vary with the virus. Surra of India proved to be the most virulent, and caderas the least. Nagana and dourine occupied intermediate positions. The rats that escaped infection showed no trace of immunity when tested with small quantities of the same virus between the twelfth and the twenty-eighth days after the intra-stomachal inoculations. The majority of the rats tested for immunity with surra of India and nagana seemed to have acquired, instead of an immunity, a certain hypersensitiveness to infection. Five of the seven nagana rats died before their controls. The results of testing the vitality of the trypanosomes of caderas, dourine, and nagana introduced directly into the stomachs and intestines of living rats seem to show that both motility and virulence are usually lost in less than two hours. Surra of India proved exceptionally resistant to the harmful influences of the stomach, for in one case, surra trypanosomes introduced into the intestines were found to be sluggishly motile in the stomach one hour and fifty-five minutes later, and in another instance, surra parasites injected into the stomach were found, when removed from that organ two hours later, to be actively motile and infectious.
1. Fresh and inactivated animal serum under proper conditions will bind pepsin quantitatively in weak acid solution and will prevent it from digesting proteid even after the addition of free hydrochloric acid in excess. 2. This binding and inactivation of pepsin cannot be considered as due to a specific anti-pepsin. 3. The phenomenon has been named pepsin deviation in analogy with the deviation described for other ferments, notably trypsin. 4. The ability of animal serum to deviate pepsin has been responsible for most, if not all, of the published accounts of anti-pepsin. 5. By the use of a technique elaborated to control pepsin deviation, it has been found impossible to demonstrate normal anti-pepsin in the blood serum of the dog, cat, guinea pig, beef, horse, rabbit, and of man.
The results of these experiments show, in short, that, by the method employed, adrenalin could neither be demonstrated in the specimen of blood, nor in either of the two specimens of malignant hypernephroma, nor in the specimen of metastatic tissue from the adrenal tumor which closely resembled a malignant hypernephroma. The results agree with those of Greer and Wells in showing that no adrenalin is found in malignant renal hypernephromas; and the further observation is made that no adrenalin content of the blood of a patient with malignant renal hypernephroma could be shown by the rabbit uterus strip test. Those rare tumors which arise from medullary adrenal tissue might be expected to contain adrenalin; but as pointed out by Greer and Wells, since the ordinary malignant renal hypernephroma arises from adrenal rests which consist of cortical tissue, and since the cortex of adrenal contains no adrenalin, no adrenalin should be expected in the tumors arising from such cortical tissue.
1. I have proposed the name luetin for an emulsion or extract of pure cultures of Treponema pallidum which is designed to be employed for obtaining, in suitable cases, a specific cutaneous reaction that may become a valuable diagnostic sign in certain stages or forms of syphilitic infection. 2. The repeated inoculation of either living or killed pallida into the testicles of rabbits leads to a condition in which an intradermic injection of luetin is followed by a well marked inflammatory reaction. A corresponding reaction has been obtained neither in rabbits suffering from active syphilitic orchitis, nor in those in which the condition had been cured by the administration of salvarsan four months previously. Normal rabbits, likewise, do not react to the luetin. 3. The luetin produces a similar cutaneous reaction in syphilitic and parasyphilitic patients that is most constant and severe in the tertiary and hereditary affections. In my series of cases, it was present constantly (100 per cent.) in the manifest tertiary affection, in 94 per cent. of latent tertiary affection, and in 96 per cent. of the hereditary affection. 4. During the primary and secondary stages, the reaction is infrequent, and when present it is of mild degree. An exception has been found in cases in which energetic treatment has been or is being carried out and in which clinical signs of syphilis are absent. Such cases may show a severe reaction. Apparently this is true especially of the cases treated with salvarsan. 5. In certain cases of old infection in which no treatment has been taken and in which no symptoms have appeared for many years, and in the course of which miscarriages have not occurred, the cutaneous reaction has failed to appear. But, despite the absence of symptoms, mothers who have young syphilitic children have usually given the reaction. 6. It remains to be determined in how far the cutaneous reaction with luetin can be used to supplement the Wassermann reaction in determining the complete and permanent suppression of a syphilitic affection. 7. It appears probable that the Wassermann reaction is more constant in the primary and secondary, and the cutaneous reaction in the tertiary and latent forms of syphilis. Moreover, it appears that the Wassermann reaction is more directly and immediately affected by antisyphilitic treatment than is the cutaneous reaction. 8. A more active preparation of luetin can certainly be produced by improved methods. This phase of the subject is being considered at the present time and will be reported upon in a later paper.
The maintenance of life of an individual with an open double pneumothorax under differential pressure depends essentially upon the normal position of the lower lobes of the lungs and their close approximation to the diaphragm, especially of the posterior parts of the lobes. A complete dislodgment of both lower lobes leads invariably to the death of the individual, which may occur in a very short time, or after fifteen to twenty-five minutes. In all cases the respiration is affected first; it slows almost at once and stops invariably before the heart. The result is the same whether the vagi are intact or both nerves are cut. Exceptionally, respiration may continue even after the separation of the lungs from the diaphragm, but only by having all the lobes well approximated to the thoracic walls. When by dislodgment of the lower lobes the respiration is stopped and the heart is feeble and slow, or stopped completely, it is rarely possible to restore life by artificial respiration or by other appropriate means. The extent of the exchange of gases occurring in normal respiration, with closed thoracic cavity, exceeds greatly the need for the maintenance of life, since normal respiration is provided with an abundance of factors of safety. Under differential pressure, however, life is carried on with an exchange of gases which amounts to a small fraction only of the extent of the exchange that takes place in normal respiration; respiration under differential pressure is, therefore, deprived of all factors of safety and is incapable of resisting the dangers of exceptional incidents. Deaths occurring in connection with the differential pressure have their cause essentially in this unguarded state of the function of respiration. Under tracheal insufflation, the function of respiration is surrounded with effective safeguards, at least as much as is normal respiration. Dislodgment of the lungs has no detrimental effect. After complete collapse of the lungs, capillary adhesions within the alveoli and the small bronchi become an additional obstacle to the redistension and respiration. Differential pressure holds this obstacle in abeyance. When the lungs become collapsed during an open pneumothorax, it should be kept in mind that the force which is required for redistension is greater than that which is sufficient to keep the lungs continually distended. At the beginning of a redistension, therefore, a higher pressure should be employed for a short time.
This investigation comprises a study of venous pulse, carotid, cardiographic, and heart sound records from twenty-one men with normal hearts. The heart sounds were recorded by the method of Einthoven. When correction is made for transmission, the first heart sound begins, on an average, 0.131 of a second before the c-wave of the venous pulse, and has an average duration of 0.128 of a second. The second heart sound begins a few hundredths of a second before the v-wave and has a duration of 0.091 of a second. The third heart sound occurs shortly before or is coincident with the beginning of the h-wave. It has an average duration of about 0.03 of a second. Considerable variation from the average positions are noted in individual cases. This is especially true in the relation between the second heart sound and the v-wave. Measurements of the venous pulse and heart sound intervals show that the a-c, c-v, and v-h venous pulse intervals, the first to second and the second to third heart sound intervals, and systole tend to remain fairly constant in length when cardiac cycles of different length are considered. The v-a, h-a, and x-a venous pulse intervals, the third to first heart sound interval, and diastole tend to vary in length with variations in total length of the cycle. Records of the venous pulse and heart sound obtained from dogs show a similar relation to that found in man. The main difference observed was an earlier occurrence of the first heart sound before the c-wave of the venous pulse.
1. It has been shown that powdered hematin is exceedingly resistant to the metabolic action of tissue cells, and wherever injected it will remain for weeks with but slight and slowly progressing alteration. 2. The changes produced in hematin by tissue cells are identical with those changes resulting from the oxidation of hematin by hydrogen peroxid, forming a series of bodies of decreasing color intensity, which manifest an iron reaction in inverse proportion to their color. 3. These hemosideroid pigments are distinguished from true hemosiderin by the type of their iron reaction, by their solubility in dilute alkalies, and by their destructive oxidation by hydrogen peroxid. 4. Crystalline hematin injected into the tissues is subject to the same changes as powdered hematin. 3. Whereas powdered parahemosiderin is converted into hemosiderin by the tissue cells with comparative ease, powdered hematin shows no such conversion within forty-seven days, and as the only demonstrable change produced in hematin by the tissue cells does not result in the formation of either hemosiderin or hematoidin, the assumption that hematin is the progenitor of these pigments seems unwarranted.
1. In a study of 129 cases of appendicitis in children, we have found that in nineteen of them (15 per cent.) the appendix contained Oxyuris vermicularis or Trichocephalus trichiura. 2. The oxyuris is much the commoner of the two parasites, occurring seventeen times, while the trichocephalus was found only twice. 3. In fifteen out of the nineteen cases, the parasites were associated with a non-suppurative catarrhal type of appendicitis. If the four cases of catarrhal oxyuris appendicitis of adults be also included, it may be said that 83 per cent. of the cases of appendicitis associated with parasites have been of the catarrhal type. In the four remaining cases, the appendix was gangrenous. The cellular changes noted in the catarrhal cases have been distension of the crypts with mucus, hyperplasia of the lymph follicles, and in some cases, the presence of a few leukocytes in the muscularis and serosa. 4. In thirteen of the nineteen cases (70 per cent.), there have been noted, in addition to the cellular changes, certain lesions in the mucosa, unquestionably produced by the parasite. Of the six cases in which no specific lesions were demonstrated, the extensive gangrene in three of them might have obliterated specific lesions had they been present. Specific lesions were not demonstrated in any one of the four adult cases. 5. The oxyuris injures the mucosa by breaking through the lining epithelium and burrowing into the lymph follicles for a greater or less distance. Its invasion is usually accompanied by extravasation of blood into the surrounding lymphoid tissue, and its escape through the ruptured mucosa. In some cases, the oxyuris produces hemorrhagic ulcers in the mucous membrane, the edges of which are undermined and the bases formed by the submucosa. A characteristic feature of the oxyuris lesions is the absence of inflammatory reaction about them, except in those cases where there is secondary bacterial infection. 6. In some instances, the oxyuris may become encapsulated in the mucosa with fibrous tissue, and itself undergo hyaline degeneration. Such a process constitutes a healed oxyuris lesion. 7. The trichocephalus attacks the mucous membrane of the appendix in a manner similar to that described for the oxyuris, and there is the same absence of inflammation about the invading parasite. The trichocephalus, however, instead of invading a lymph follicle, shows a tendency to burrow along just beneath the columnar epithelium. 8. The conclusion to be drawn from these facts is that oxyuris and trichocephalus, when they occur in a diseased appendix, are, in most cases, the existing cause of the pathological changes found.
Pregnant dogs are susceptible to chloroform administered shortly before delivery or during labor, and show the same degree of liver injury as normal dogs, or even a somewhat greater one. Chloroform anesthesia may cause more or less hyaline necrosis in the border zone between the maternal and fetal parts of the placenta that may lead to hemorrhage, placental separation, and premature delivery. Chloroform anesthesia causes no injury to the liver of the fetus nor to any other fetal organ, in spite of the fact that it can be demonstrated to be present in these tissues. These experiments raise objections to the use of chloroform in pregnant women where an anesthetic must be continued for half an hour or longer. Chloroform anesthesia may be admissible for the few minutes at the end of the delivery, but when operative measures are necessary, before or after delivery, it is a dangerous anesthetic and surely capable of producing injury to the liver in the manner recognized in the case of normal persons. Objections may be raised to the application of conclusions derived from experiments on dogs to human cases; but the similarity of the effects of chloroform in man and dog surely affords a sound basis of comparison. Two fundamental facts would seem to be now established: (1) Normal human adults may be fatally poisoned (late chloroform poisoning) by chloroform anesthesia of one half to one hour's duration. (2) Normal and pregnant dogs are equally susceptible to late chloroform poisoning, and may be fatally poisoned by an anesthesia of two hours' duration. Hence one may conclude that probably normal and pregnant human beings are equally susceptible to chloroform poisoning, that chloroform anesthesia during any part of the pregnant period is capable of causing liver necrosis, and, consequently, that chloroform is a dangerous anesthetic.
Employing the liver necrosis as an index, we find that pups are immune to the poisonous action of chloroform anesthesia. This immunity or resistance to late chloroform poisoning is complete in the first week, very striking during the second and third weeks, and usually disappears during the fourth week of life. Nests of blood-forming cells (blood islands) are numerous in the sinuses of the liver during the first week and normally become progressively less numerous each week until the liver is almost free from these cells at the end of the fourth week of life. It is considered possible that these leucocytes in the blood islands protect the liver against the specific action of a known poison (chloroform). The mechanism of this hypothetical protective action is not understood, but it may consist of a process of neutralization. Perhaps this protective action against poisons is an important part of the functions of white blood cells and may bear an important relationship to the process of inflammation.
1. The living tissue of the chicken sarcoma, when implanted in susceptible hosts, survives, proliferates, and thus gives rise apparently to the whole of the new tumor. The histological findings about the graft do not suggest any other origin for the growth. 2. In fowls with a natural or acquired resistance, a very striking series of phenomena takes place about the graft or the established growth. They are referable to the presence of the living neoplastic cells and are essentially similar to those already described in mammals. 3. The lymphocyte has an association with the processes of resistance in the fowl, similar to, but more marked than that observed in mammals. 4. Resistance of the host does not constitute for the chicken tumor a differential means whereby the extrinsic agent present in the growth can be observed to engender it. In general, it may be stated that, when the new host is so unfavorable to the transplanted sarcoma cells as to cause their death, no tumor develops. 5. The activity of the extrinsic agent is negligible as affecting the interpretation of the phenomena about grafts of the avian sarcoma in resistant and susceptible hosts. They are referable to the presence of the transplanted cells. 6. The appearance or non-appearance of a specific, supporting, and vascularizing reaction in the host tissues cannot be looked upon as determining the fate of grafts of the chicken sarcoma. The same seems to be true of mammalian neoplasms.
Since guinea pig bone marrow and lymph gland cultivated for five days with goat blood generate substances that are hemolytic for goat red blood corpuscles, it can be concluded that tissues living outside of the organism react against an antigen by the production of an antibody.
Fatal leprosy, with all its clinical and pathological manifestations in man, may be experimentally induced in the monkey (Macacus rhesus) with a pure culture of the acid-fast bacillus cultivated by one of us (Duval) from a leprous lesion in man. To produce the disease experimentally, it seems necessary to give the animal repeated injections of large numbers of leprosy bacilli at given intervals for a period of months. That the infection is more likely to follow where sensitization is first established is definitely proven by the specific experiments that we have carried out upon a variety of laboratory animals. The first injection, we assume, sensitizes the animal and may consist of either killed or viable lepra bacilli. The necessity of first sensitizing the monkey and then giving repeated doses of viable organisms over a long period might explain the relative infrequency of the disease in man; at least, it offers an explanation of the fact that man rarely, if ever, contracts leprosy, although intimately associated for an indefinite period with those afflicted with the disease. The leprous lesions in the monkey are histologically indistinguishable from those in man and do not essentially resemble the specific lesion of tuberculosis, blastomycosis, or the lesions experimentally produced with saprophytic acid-fast species, since the appearance of large lepra cells and the arrangement of the bacilli in dense packets within these cells to form the so-called globi is a constant and characteristic feature for the experimental as well as the human lesion (figures 17, 18, and 19). The production of leprosy in the monkey proves conclusively that the acid-fast bacillus cultivated by one of us (Duval) from the human lesion is the Hansen bacillus and not some extraneous saprophyte, and that it is the etiological factor in human leprosy. In our experience, it has been extremely difficult to produce, in the lower animals, more than a transient localized lesion with human leprous material rich in the specific bacilli, unless the animal is first sensitized, when lesions histologically identical with those produced by pure cultures are easily induced. Therefore, it is natural to expect that cultures of Bacillus leproe which are many generations removed from the parent stem are less likely to infect, unless given in larger doses on the ground of loss in virulence. When experimental leprous lesions occur in the internal organs, they are more often found in the liver and spleen, while the experimental lesions occasionally produced in the lower animals with some of the saprophyte species, such as the bacillus of timothy hay, Moeller's grass bacilli, etc., rarely, if ever, occur in these organs (Abbott and Gildersleeve). These authors did not find lesions in the liver and spleen in a single instance after inoculating forty-five rabbits intravenously with large doses of the "confusing group." Furthermore, the cell picture and the appearance and arrangement of these bacilli in the lesions in no way resemble experimental leprosy (Hlscher). It is no indication that a given culture is not the Hansen bacillus because the individual organisms differ in size and shape from those in the tissues, since it is a well known fact that marked variations in morphology are common for many bacterial species under natural and artificial conditions. One of us (Couret) has already pointed out that there is a wide variation in morphology for Bacillus leproe under different environments. The experimental work serves not only to emphasize this fact, but is proof that a transformation from the slender beaded rods of the tissues to solidly staining diplococcoid forms of culture does occur for Bacillus leproe; and, conversely, that the coccoid forms of culture may again assume the slender beaded appearance by passage through warm-blooded animals.
Those conditions of the new-born characterized by a hemorrhagic tendency, icterus, and fatty changes, are probably all syndromes which may occur as the result of a number of toxic agents. All of them, however, have been produced, in these experiments, by the action of a single experimental agent. Thus, a picture indistinguishable from that called Buhl's disease has been obtained by the use of chloroform, as have also the pictures known as Winckel's disease, melaena neonatorum, etc. Chloroform is not held to be the only substance that has this power. It stands rather as one member of a group of agents, the effects of which in general and in individual organs are similar to those caused by lack of oxygen. The essential features of these conditions have also been produced by direct asphyxiation of the fetus. The suggestion is therefore made that underlying all these symptoms and pathological complexes, there is a deficiency of oxidation, general, local, or selective, thus bringing this group of diseases into the general category of acute yellow atrophy of the liver, eclampsia, pernicious vomiting, cyclic vomiting, phosphorus poisoning, etc. In human beings, chloroform and asphyxia must, in many instances, be the determining causes. There remain, however, other cases in which different factors are to be sought.
1. In most cases of chronic or subacute bacterial endocarditis due to the endocarditis coccus (Streptococcus viridans), there exists a distinctive pathological lesion in some of the glomeruli due to bacterial emboli. 2. The salient features of the pathological picture are first, the involvement of one or more loops of a variable number of glomeruli; secondly, the absence of any visible disease in the uninvolved glomeruli and in the uninvolved portions of affected glomeruli; and thirdly, the association in most of the bacterial cases of all the various stages of the glomerular process often seen in a single microscopical section. 3. The lesion does not occur in cases of acute endocarditis, and up to the present time it has been absent in cases of subacute bacterial endocarditis due to organisms other than the endocarditis coccus. 4. In a group of cases having vegetations that are typical of those in the active stage of subacute endocarditis (except that they are free from bacteria and healing or healed), the healed stage of this distinctive glomerular lesion is present, although it is less extensive than in the active bacterial cases. 5. These cases, therefore, are most probably examples of subacute bacterial endocarditis due originally to the endocarditis coccus, but in which the endocardial vegetations have become free from bacteria rather early in their course and are now healing or healed, as claimed by Harbitz and Libman. 6. During the active bacterial stage of the disease, if the glomerular lesions are not too numerous, the only symptoms produced will be an almost constant hematuria, usually demonstrable only microscopically. If the glomerular lesions are very numerous, symptoms resembling those of subacute hemorrhagic nephritis may occur and may even cause a fatal issue. If the glomerular lesions are very numerous but not sufficient to cause death, and the cardiac lesion should go on to healing, a contracted kidney, secondary to the glomerular lesion, may subsequently ensue and produce the typical symptoms and death. In such a case, the finding of the healed or healing lesion of subacute bacterial endocarditis will be accidental.
In the first experiment, a segment of popliteal artery, extirpated from the leg of a young man and preserved for twenty-four days in cold storage, was transplanted upon the abdominal aorta of a small bitch. The animal lived in excellent health for four years and two months, became pregnant several times, and finally died during labor. The abdominal aorta was normal, but the human arterial segment was slightly dilated, and its wall was composed of connective tissue only. In the second experiment, a segment of dog's jugular vein, preserved for twenty-four hours in cold storage, was transplanted upon the thoracic aorta of a fox terrier. In spite of slight lesions of the cord due to interruption of the aortic circulation during the operation, the animal remained in excellent health. After two years and two months, the dog died of an epidemic disease. The descending aorta was normal. The transplanted segment had about the same caliber as that of the aorta, but its wall was composed of connective tissue, with no evidence of muscular or elastic tissues. In these two experiments, the walls of the transplanted segments contained neither muscle nor elastic tissue fibers and were not thicker than those of the artery. Nevertheless, they were able to withstand the pressure of the blood without undergoing any marked dilatation. If death due to accident had not brought these two experiments to an end, it is probable that the transplanted segment would have successfully resisted the pressure of the blood for a much longer time. As it is, the result shows that, in one experiment after four years and in the other after two years, the segments transplanted upon the abdominal and thoracic aortas were still efficient.
1. Bone marrow of guinea pigs grows better in autogenic than in homogenic serum. 2. Bone marrow of guinea pigs grows more extensively and rapidly in unheated than in heated autogenic and homogenic serum (56 degrees C. for half an hour). 3. In different heterogenic sera, there are differences in the growth of the tissue. In none of the sera examined, was the growth so extensive as in homogenic and autogenic serum. 4. Heated heterogenic serum is a better culture medium and shows more extensive tissue growth than normal unheated heterogenic serum.
1. Adrenalin causes a marked constriction of the human coronary artery, although it undoubtedly produces a relaxation in some mammals; e. g., calf, sheep, pig, etc. 2. The human coronary artery is probably provided with sympathetic vasoconstrictors. 3. If human blood-vessels are obtained in a warm condition within a few hours after death, they are often suitable for biological and pharmacological study.
As a result of the experimental work here recorded, there can be no doubt of the fact that the rate of inflow in shock was faster than normally, and in my experiments the average increase was 36 per cent. It is concluded, therefore, that decreased vasomotor tone is an accompaniment of shock.
The most marked chemical changes in a disintegrating spleen are noticed during the period when karyorrhexis and karyolysis are the characteristic features. When pyknosis alone is prominent almost all of the several constituents are in the coagulable or precipitable fraction, just as they are in the original normal tissue. After karyolysis is practically complete the coagulable and precipitable elements of the tissue still gradually decrease in amount, but the rate is far below that occurring during karyorrhexis and karyolysis. Moreover, even when microscopical nuclear disintegration is practically at an end, the chemical process of disintegration is still going on, but very slowly. Finally, when nuclear structures can no longer be seen in the spleen, about 72 per cent. of the nuclein nitrogen, about 50 per cent. of the original insoluble phosphorus, and 70 per cent. of the original insoluble nitrogen, are still in the insoluble form (precipitable and coagulable by alcohol), while about two thirds of the phosphatid phosphorus remains in complex organic combinations.
In two cases of infantilism there was poor absorption from the intestines of nitrogen, sulphur, phosphorus, calcium, and magnesium. The excretion of these elements in the urine was low. The excretion of calcium in the urine was so small as to be negligible. The excretion of calcium into the intestines was increased. The complete balance experiments showed that while other elements were retained, calcium was lost.
In two cases of infantilism of the type of Herter, in one case of achondroplasia, and in one case of cretinism, creatin was constantly present in the urine and was increased in amount when the ingestion of carbohydrates was increased.
A strain of Spirochoeta refringens has been obtained in pure culture, and its morphological and cultural characteristics have been studied. The strain possessed no pathogenicity for rabbits or monkeys. It probably belongs to the genus Treponema, but it is easily differentiated from Treponema pallidum, Treponema microdentium, and Treponema macrodentium. Its relation to Spirochoeta balanitidis and Spirochoeta buccalis is still undetermined.
The absorption of amboceptor by corpuscles is rapid, a considerable amount being absorbed in as short a period as fifteen seconds. In the sensitization of corpuscles, the amount of amboceptor absorbed by the different corpuscles is not uniform, the inequality depending on the time taken in obtaining an even distribution of the corpuscles through the diluted immune serum. Amboceptor absorption is apparently influenced by the concentration of the corpuscles, being more rapid with a 5 per cent. than with a 2 per cent. suspension, and thus the stronger concentration is more susceptible to inequality of sensitization from variations in the method of activation. In experimental work, it is of importance to obtain as equal a sensitization as possible. It is essential that in comparative titrations the same method of activation be employed in the several titrations, and where possible it is advisable that all the cells used be sensitized together in bulk. The results obtained in titrating hemolytic sera and complement depend to a considerable extent upon the evenness of sensitization of the corpuscles.
The experiments here described indicate that the peptone fractions can alter the different blood elements in such a manner as to affect their immunological reactions. This power is not possessed by all the peptones equally, either qualitatively or quantitatively. If we regard the phenomenon of hemolysis by immune serum in the light of a biochemical process, depending upon properties inherent in certain constituents of the serum and the red blood cells, the experiments described reveal a number of facts concerning the immunochemical action of albumoses and peptones. These substances, which depend for their separation and identification upon purely physical means, show differences in their behavior toward the elements concerned in the production of hemolysis. Inagaki (7) has shown that the albumoses can combine with nucleohiston. It is not improbable, therefore, that some of the reactions are chemical as well as physicochemical in character. Further studies are necessary to determine whether the reactions elicited can aid us in the differentiation of the peptone bodies, for which at present we possess but few tests. The results, however, are suggestive, and may aid in recognizing the presence of these substances in blood serum.
Salvarsan in capsule and in solution in doses varying from 0.1 to 0.6 of a gram was administered by mouth to seven patients suffering from syphilis. Five patients were given full doses of 0.6 of a gram. One patient (case 3) received in the aggregate within four weeks 2.4 grams without loss of weight or any disturbing effects. An ulcerating gumma of the knee was practically healed after a period of five weeks. This was the only patient of the seven, however, in whom notable improvement in the cutaneous manifestations followed the administration of the drug. This ulceration would probably have healed as soon, or possibly sooner, under the influence of mercury and the iodids. From the above observations, it would appear that salvarsan administered by mouth up to the full dose of 0.6 of a gram, has a perceptible though feeble therapeutic effect on cutaneous syphilitic manifestations. We should naturally expect the influence of any drug to be more evident in the case of a gumma, in which spirochaetes are only sparsely present, than in the secondary syphilides in which the spirochaetes are present in enormous numbers. Cutaneous gummata are readily healed at times by very small doses of mercury or iodids. It is interesting to note that the administration of the full dose of the drug by mouth does not appear to give rise to symptoms of systemic arsenical poisoning, unless the vomiting and diarrhea be regarded as such. After some of the full dose administrations, there was neither vomiting nor diarrhea. As salvarsan contains 34 per cent. of arsenic, these patients received the equivalent of five grains of arsenic. In case 3, in the course of four weeks the patient took by mouth the equivalent of over twelve grains of arsenic, without vomiting or having diarrhea, and with no loss of weight or disturbance of health. The urine of this patient was entirely normal. It would seem, therefore, that salvarsan is not converted in the gastro-intestinal tract into an organotropic arsenical compound, and it is possible that it may remain practically unchanged.
1. Foreign body giant cells may be produced in vitro by the addition of foreign objects such as lycopodium spores and cotton fibers to cultures of chick embryo spleen. 2. These giant cells are formed by the fusion of large mononuclear wandering cells, probably endothelial cells and pulp cells. Connective tissue cells do not take part in their formation. 3. The large giant cells sometimes seen spread out over the cover-glass in cultures of chick embryo spleen are probably foreign body giant cells, the cover-glass acting as the foreign body.
In two series of experiments made at the end of 1911 and at the beginning of 1912, new techniques were developed with the view of investigating the problem of prolonging indefinitely the life of tissues isolated from the organism. These techniques are far from perfect and will doubtless be modified in the future. But they have already permitted the establishment of new facts. Fragments of connective tissue have been kept in vitro in a condition of active life for more than two months. As a few cultures are now eighty-five days old and are growing very actively, it is probable that, if no accident occurs, the life of these cultures will continue for a long time. In some cases the rate of growth of the tissues increased in direct ratio to the age of the culture. Fragments of heart pulsated rhythmically at the beginning of the third month of their life in vitro. These facts show that experiments made with these or with more perfect techniques and followed over long periods of time may lead to the solution of the problem of permanent life of tissues in vitro, and give important information on the characters acquired by tissues liberated from the control of the organism from which they were derived.
THE WRITER BELIEVES THAT THE EXPERIMENTS ABOVE RECORDED HAVE DEMONSTRATED THE FOLLOWING POINTS: 1. As has been previously shown by other workers, complement is fixed by the precipitate formed in the reaction between unformed proteid and its homologous antiserum, and it is the precipitate only which fixes, the supernatant fluid being devoid of fixing power except to a slight degree in tubes very rich in antigen. This latter fixation is probably due to a redissolving of the precipitin-precipitinogen complex which, as Gay has shown, does not lose its fixing power on resolution. The fixation of complement by mixtures in which antigen is so slight in amount that no precipitate is formed may be explained by analogy with colloidal reactions in which combination of colloids takes place without precipitation unless definite quantitative relations are maintained. 2. In contrast to the results above described, precipitating mixtures of bacterial antigen and antiserum show complement fixation both by the precipitate and by the supernatant fluid. 3. The complement fixation by the supernatant fluid of such bacterial precipitin reactions, with the precipitate removed, is, in the presence of washed bacteria, equal to that exerted by the same amount of the original serum. The complement fixation of the precipitates, here, as in serum-antiserum tests, is proportionate to the bulk of the precipitate. 4. The precipitin body is not removed from a bacterial antiserum by treatment with washed whole bacteria, whereas the cell sensitizer or amboceptor is removed by such treatment. The writer believes that the work recorded above justifies Gengou's conclusion that an albuminolytic sensitizer is formed in response to immunization with unformed proteids. This sensitizer, or amboceptor, is, however, distinct and independent of the sensitizer that reacts specifically with either bacterial or other cells. It would appear that immunization with unformed proteids calls forth only the formation of these albuminolysins, while immunization with cells, in our case the typhoid bacillus, calls forth both the cytolytic and the albuminolytic sensitizers. The albuminolytic sensitizers are not carried down mechanically with the precipitates in the precipitin reactions. We see no reason for not considering them identical with the precipitins themselves, bodies which combine with the dissolved antigens and, as in other colloidal reactions, lead to precipitation when definite quantitative relations are observed. The undiminished precipitating value of a bacterial antiserum after considerable amounts of bacterial amboceptor have been absorbed out of it, would point against the identification of agglutinins with precipitins. However, this question must be subjected to further study. It is thus clear that only the cytolytic sensitizer can enter into combination with the washed bacterial cell, while it is probable that both cytolytic and albuminolytic sensitizer may combine with the dissolved ingredients of a bacterial filtrate. Whether or not they combine with the same constituent of such an antigen cannot be decided by our experiments.
The paroxysm of hematin intoxication in the rabbit undoubtedly presents many features of striking similarity to the paroxysm of human malaria; still one must hesitate to apply such results unreservedly in an attempt to identify the causative agent of the malarial paroxysm. When, in addition to the character of the paroxysm, we consider the sequence of events in the two instances, the analogy becomes so close that it seems impossible to regard the matter as a mere coincidence. The injection of hematin, especially in fractional doses, is in a measure comparable to the liberation of hematin into the human circulation by the malarial parasite. In these experiments, See PDF for Structure both solution and finely divided suspensions of hematin have been found equally effective in eliciting the phenomena of the paroxysm, and while it seems possible that a portion of the malarial pigment might be dissolved in the alkaline human serum, such an assumption is probably not essential. It might be objected that the toxic action of foreign hematin thus injected into the circulation would probably be greater than that of hematin derived from an animal's own blood, but as far as I have been able to determine, this objection does not seem valid, as rabbit hematin, dog hematin, and ox hematin produce in the rabbit effects that are alike in both character and degree. The dose of hematin remains as the one factor to which it is possible to attach some degree of uncertainty, but even here the author feels that the range of experimental conditions has been kept within the bounds of legitimate analogy with conditions existing in the human subject of malarial infection. Finally, the most conservative estimate of the value of such experiments points strongly to the fact that we have at least a potentially toxic substance in the pigment hematin as liberated by the malarial parasite into the circulation of the human host. There is also abundant evidence to show that the action of hematin is not confined to the paroxysmal phenomena of malaria, but that other features of the disease may find their explanation in the action of this pigment. For the present, however, it seems advisable to confine the discussion to this one phase of the question.
It is generally accepted that complement may be split into a mid-piece and an end-piece. The mid-piece is thought to be in the globulin fraction, and the end-piece in the albumin fraction. The restoration of complement activity by putting together the albumin and globulin fractions does not prove, however, that each fraction contained a part of the complement, for the albumin fraction can be reactivated in the absence of the globulin fraction. Complement-splitting as brought about by hydrochloric acid, carbon dioxid, and dialysis, is really an inactivation of the whole complement by certain acids or alkalis, either added in the free state to the serum, or liberated as a result of the dissociation of certain electrolytes. That the whole complement, and not a part only, is present in the albumin fraction of the serum can be demonstrated by the removal of the inhibitory action of the acid or alkali. This can be effected by the addition, not only of alkali or acid, but also of any amphoteric substance. When hydrochloric acid, carbon dioxid, or dialysis are employed to produce the phenomenon known as complement-splitting, the complement is merely inactivated, not split.
It has been shown by these experiments that after the removal of one superior cervical ganglion of a rabbit, 1/50 of a cubic centimeter of a 1:1,000 adrenalin solution (=0.02 of a milligram of adrenalin) per kilo of body weight injected intravenously, is practically the minimum amount that will produce in nearly all cases a perceptible dilatation of the pupil. In one out of eight animals this dose failed to give a definite effect, while in two others the effect was slight. Six experiments with injections of 1/50 of a cubic centimeter of adrenalin per kilo of body weight gave the following averages: a maximum dilatation of 1.62 millimeters, which showed the first sign of decreasing in four minutes and had disappeared entirely in ten minutes after the injection. Six experiments with 1/30 of a cubic centimeter per kilo gave the following averages: a maximum dilatation of 2.25 millimeters, which began to disappear in eight minutes and had entirely disappeared in twenty-eight minutes. For thirteen experiments with 1/20 of a cubic centimeter of adrenalin per kilo these averages were: a maximum dilatation of 3.61 millimeters, a beginning recovery from dilatation in six minutes, with complete recovery of the pupil in thirty-seven minutes. With 1/10 of a cubic centimeter of adrenalin per kilo (eight experiments) the averages were: a maximum dilatation of 3.87 millimeters, a beginning recovery in ten minutes, with complete recovery of the pupil in forty-five minutes. Finally, eleven experiments with 2/10 of a cubic centimeter of adrenalin per kilo gave averages as follows: a maximum dilatation of 4.38 millimeters, a beginning recovery from dilatation in twenty minutes, with complete recovery only after one hundred minutes or more. The time between the injection and the appearance of the maximum dilatation of the pupil varied somewhat according to the dose of adrenalin. In the series of experiments with 1/50 of a cubic centimeter of adrenalin per kilo of body weight the average for this interval was one minute; in the series with 1/30, 1/20, and 1/10 of a cubic centimeter the average length of this interval was about three minutes, while the experiments with 2/10 of a cubic centimeter give us an average for this interval of six and a half minutes, with individual instances in which the maximum dilatation was seen only after fourteen, seventeen, and twenty-two minutes after the injection. In those animals in which the maximum pupil dilatation was especially delayed, there were almost always more or less alarming symptoms of general prostration for a short time after the injection, and the maximum dilatation appeared as these symptoms gradually disappeared. In other words, with an increase in the size of the dose of adrenalin, there was a gradual increase in the following: (1) the time between the injection and the appearance of the maximum dilatation; (2) the amount of dilatation produced; (3) the interval between the injection and the beginning of recovery from dilatation; and (4) in the total time between the injection and the return of the pupil to its normal size. After removal of the ganglion a certain time must elapse before the increase in the sensitiveness develops. During the first ten to fifteen hours there is practically no increase in the sensitiveness. After eighteen hours a moderate effect can be obtained which rapidly increases so that by twenty to twenty-four hours after the removal of the ganglion any given dose of adrenalin produces practically as great a dilatation as it will give at any later time. The experiments teach us that, on account of the individual variation in the degree of dilatation produced by a given dose of adrenin, we may not determine with exactness from any given degree of dilatation of the pupil the quantity of adrenin injected into the blood stream, and that we can not state with absolute exactness either the smallest dose that will constantly cause a dilatation, or mention the exact amount of adrenin which will in no case cause a dilatation of the pupil. However, the results permit the general statement that very small doses of adrenin on entering the circulation cause a fairly prolonged definite dilatation of a deganglionized pupil. Since this is true, there are then at least two ways in which a rabbit from which one superior cervical ganglion has been previously removed may be used for determining qualitatively the amount of adrenin present. If, for example, we have a solution which may or may not contain adrenin, and upon injecting it obtain a dilatation of the deganglionized pupil only while the pupil on the normal side remains unchanged in size, we are justified in assuming that the solution contains adrenin. Again, if after stimulation of the peripheral end of a splanchnic nerve or other procedure upon the animal body under conditions that exclude the possibility of reflex effects, a dilatation of the deganglionized pupil results, while its normal mate remains unchanged, the assumption is warranted, though not absolutely proved, that some adrenin has been thrown into the circulation. This test for the presence of adrenin has the advantage over other tests, that the pupil on the normal side will always act as a control.
1. The bactericidal agent extracted from horse leucocytes is apparently precipitated quantitatively by full saturation with ammonium sulphate. 2. The bactericidal agent is apparently precipitated by absolute alcohol, and is not rendered insoluble by a short contact with alcohol. The agent resembled in this feature certain enzymes which can be isolated and purified by alcoholic precipitation.
1. A hitherto undescribed spiral organism has been isolated in pure culture from a case of mild phagedenic ulcer on the external genitalia of a woman. For this organism the name Spirochoeta phagedenis is proposed. 2. Spirochoeta phagedenis is a strict anaerobe and grows in the presence of fresh tissue in ascitic agar. It produces no apparent change in the media, but a somewhat offensive odor develops in the culture tube. 3. Spirochoeta phagedenis incites a slight inflammatory reaction in the skin of a Macacus rhesus monkey and in the skin and testicles of rabbits. 4. Its etiological relation to the phagedenic lesions on the external genitalia has not yet been determined.
This work proves that the proteolytic action of leucocytes is not a simple cleavage by one ferment. There are present two proteases, one acting in an alkaline medium and the other in an acid medium. This confirms Opie's work. In the leucocytes there was found in addition an ereptic ferment which is capable of acting in an acid or alkaline medium. Since this action is lost by heating to 70 degrees C., and by drying and keeping the leucocytes, it probably represents a ferment which acts on the digestion products of the two proteases. Analogy with other ferments in the body confirms this opinion.
FROM A STUDY OF THE ACCOMPANYING TRACINGS WE MAY CONCLUDE THAT: 1. The delicate mechanism of the micrograph registers the movements in the heart and blood-vessels more accurately than does the polygraph. 2. The inertia of the polygraph lever and diaphragm distorts the tracing. The difference between the results obtained with the two instruments is shown by the records made simultaneously with the micrograph and the polygraph. 3. The micrograph is particularly useful for recording heart sounds. Some records illustrating this are shown. We are directing especial attention to this and will report the results in a subsequent paper. 4. While the micrograph will not supersede the polygraph or electrocardiograph, we feel that it has distinct possibilities as a clinical instrument.
In four of the seven cases the ventricles remained active from one and a half to eighteen minutes after the electrocardiograms failed to show evidence of auricular activity. In two cases the auricles outlasted the ventricles and in one case only did the auricles and ventricles stop apparently at the same time. Complete dissociation occurred three times. Some delay in the conduction time was seen in five of the seven cases. In two cases the auricles ceased to beat before evidence of impaired conduction appeared. There was always marked slowing; the slowest independent ventricular rates varied from 13.6 to 47.0. The slowest rates at which the auricles beat regularly varied from 20 to 65 per minute. There was never evidence of auricular fibrillation, although in two cases the electrocardiograms give fairly conclusive evidence that ventricular fibrillation occurred. The ventricles restablished a regular rhythm after a short period of ventricular fibrillation in one case, while in the other but one ventricular contraction occurred after the appearance of fibrillation. Characteristic changes in the ventricular complex of the electrocardiograms occurred in all the records. They consisted of a gradual fusion of the R- and T-waves, forming, when the fusion was complete, a large rounded or peaked wave. In some cases the identity of the two waves was not entirely lost. In spite of the marked change in shape of the ventricular complexes, there was often but little change in their duration. In some cases the ventricular systole was shortened at the end, while in others it was prolonged. The change in the form of the ventricular electrical complex indicates that the course of the stimulus and the manner of the contraction of the muscle were abnormal. The fact that the R-wave became gradually prolonged suggests that the conduction of the stimulus through the ventricular walls became delayed as the heart died. The fact that after death there is a continuation of cardiac muscular activity sufficient to cause a difference in electrical potential between the two sides of the body does not necessarily mean that a ventricular systole in the sense of muscular shortening takes place. It has been observed experimentally that well defined electrical complexes may be caused by cardiac activity which cannot be seen or recorded graphically. As the duration of the ventricular complexes characteristic of the dying heart usually does not differ markedly from the duration of the complexes before clinical death, it seems probable that the entire musculature of the ventricles participates in the contraction; as definite shortening, or at least a marked change in duration, would be expected if only a part of the ventricular musculature participated in the activity which produced the complex.
